Jack Hardigan is a hard-drinking, hard driving skipper, who is dating a wealthy widow in Honolulu, but apart from a certain level of affection, there is no evidence of sexual activity between them. Therefore, there is no grand regrets when she breaks off their relationship for someone else.
for as long as i can remember, my mom had this picture on the bathroom wall of our old house on keator street.
7540 Sepulveda Blvd
_____If I like someone's status on Facebook, that's because I really really ......................................... want you to check out my status.
Concern about Conficker reached a crescendo when the mainstream media, including major television networks, reported that the worm would update itself on April 1, 2009. Because of the size of the Conficker botnet — estimates ran as high as 12 million at that point — and other mysteries, hype ran at fever pitch.
I found this super cute sweater dress at goodwill and had been putting off getting some leggins until I found some cheap ones. I finally found some for $3 at Walmart (SCORE!) so I decided to break the outfit out for work. I work it with some flat Mary Jane shoes. Cute enough. It was after lunch-ish when Amy and her mom, Lisa said "why dont you try these boots on?" They were cute, black, slouchy leather. And about 2 sizes too big. (nothing that can't be fixed with some of Ed's socks!) I started to protest then said "Sure, Why not?" I loved them. They made me feel awesome. And they completed my outfit!! So you can imagine my heart when she said "You can have them if you want." "Really, I can have them? Are you sure?" It is hard to explain what exactly happened then, but I can only describe it as a new sense of confidence. Since that day, I have found my self getting back to my "roots" so far as trying not to wear the exact same things every day, and even getting a tad more...stylish? than I have been in a good long time.
I also don’t understand how you can declare your love for someone, break-up, and then a week later be out there looking for new love? Doesn’t that undermine all the previous love that you claimed to have felt? Me thinks that you are overly free with doling out the love. Which is fine, if it’s done in a way that doesn’t go around breaking hearts and wrecking havoc. You, sadly, do not have that magical touch.
filling her hollow bones with light
Time that we have been taking for granted. Time given as a gift.
I prefer dark meat (as did the writer of the article I read where I got the recipe), but traditionally this is made with a whole chicken. It's supposed to be served cold, and when sitting in the fridge, a nice wine-flavored aspic will develop. This is normal and desired. It's yummy!
As soon as I signed up the manuscript, I contacted Cornelius Van Wright and Ying-Hwa Hu. I’d worked with them before, and I thought they would be the perfect illustrators for this book, with their soft watercolors and ability to draw appealing, realistic characters.
So that it seemed the air was afraid of him;
First was the setting. This is a historical YA novel, that takes place in NYC (specifically Queens, in the 1930s, and then Manhattan, in the 1940s) and the way that Joe portrayed this place absolutely made it come alive. I've read some articles about how much work Joe did researching the little things (like the New York Subway system as it existed at the time), and it probably helps that Joe lives in NYC, but even that doesn't explain the vibrancy with which he breathes life into this setting. You'll notice what I mean immediately if you decide to read this book.
He tried. He faked. He lied. He tried. He persuaded. He lied. And, he, yes he did, failed.
Master has a wicked sense of humor. My task for this week (well i have until Tuesday night) is to learn the “Beep Beep” song and sing it to him over the phone. Seriously…i’m not kidding…i listen to the song and can’t stop laughing. i get to a certain part and i’m almost rolling out of my chair. i don’t know how i’m going to do this. The thing is really fast in one part, so when i try to keep up, i end up tripping all over the words. But anyway, now i have the damn song in my head, playing over and over…
I wish I could tell you that womanhood displaces girl guilt. But in a culture that legitimizes disrespect to females having sex outside of a committed relationship, how can it? I wish I could say the blatant hypocrisy of a male passing judgment on a female he slept with was enough to erase some sense of girl guilt, but when the larger culture agrees how can those actions not still sting?
The commenter below asks "why" Butamax has not sued Cobalt Technologies. The snswer to that question resides with Butamax, not with IPBiz. It could be that Cobalt does not infringe. Rule 11 issues are discussed elsewhere on IPBiz. The R-Squared Energy Blog has a post titled Butanol Q&A With Cobalt Technologies CEO Rick Wilson which includes the text:
"Maybe I'm not such an asshole", he said, and smiled for the first time.
"He will take you to a large upper room, furnished and ready. Make preparations for me there."
Hydraulic System
-Lay a tortilla flat on a cutting board. Spread veggie crumbles in a line in the middle of the tortilla. Spread some bean and veggie mixture on top of that. Roll the tortilla closed, and place in the baking dish. Repeat until you've filled all the tortillas.
I can take it too far, though. I wrote The Opposite of Amber – a thriller that’s coming out with Bloomsbury in 2011 – with no idea of what would happen; I just submerged myself in the characters. It took a lot of brain-beating and rewrites to make the plot fall into place. It did, in the end, but it was quite a relief. I wouldn’t like to do that all the time.
"Let go/ Jump in/ Oh well whatcha waiting for/ It's all right/ 'Cause there's beauty in the breakdown."
Thai women will not only be extremely upset, but you can cause some trouble with the police because it is a crime to speak bad about King of Thailand. You'll notice immediately upon arrival in Thailand reverence for the King in portraits, Queen and the Royal Family in songs and hymns on TV and radio. You will see the king and the Thai royal family honored in all broadcast media at least twice a day at 8:00 and 06:00. If you hear when the anthem is played, show respect, standing in silence.
If the case against the accused is pending trial, the application under oath of an interested party must be supported by
1 egg + 1 egg yolk
What a flat out horrible experience. I haven't hated a movie like this since I don't even know when, but I am not exaggerating any of this. It's stupid, it's wrongheaded, it's got no sense of direction, the acting is horrible, the lines are horrible and it undoes everything the Halloween series ever did that was good. No, seriously; fuck this shit! It's some of the worst cinematic drivel out there. If there is a movie hell, this movie is burning in it forever. And rightfully so.
Kashmiri chilli powder- 1 1/2 tsp
Various Artists-IMPRESSED 2 CD-R burn
Romney: bet u $10,000 i’ve never been cloned
The friendly waitress took our orders with an expensive recommendation of a Grouper King Special @Rm170/kg.
I agree with everybody else that Colin Baker's costume is simply awful.
Hanauma Bay was beautiful with blue, blue waters. I got some very nice shots. We were there for just 30 minutes (cheap parking at $1). The sun was out on this side of the island. We stopped at Sandy Beach where I used to body surf and watched the people in the water. Also stopped at Makapu’u point. Fabulous scenery!
HJ - 7' 9.25" - Hollis Conway, La-Lafayette - '89
introspective young women. Her albums, "The Kick Inside" and
So what could Sone say to O’Sullivan and vise versa, more than a century apart? There seems to be a strange connection for it hardly felt jarring to walk from the Smart Museum to the Renaissance Society. In fact, one does not even want to do the obvious -- to move Sone’s work into the white, modernist spaces of the Smart, and in turn, take O’Sullivan into the cramped confines of the Renaissance Society’s revivalist classroom building. The artists seem at home where they are presented and also communicate with each other.
“And what can I do for you then Greenie?”
No matter which season it is, there are always edible parts available on the cattail plant. The roots, shoots, and pollen heads can all be eaten. In the spring to early summer green cattails are very flavorful and can be eaten much like asparagus. The top and bottom portion of the plant are very fibrous at this time and can be steamed and eaten like corn on the cob. As the top portion begins to blossom producing yellow pollen you can shake it into a bag and utilize the pollen as filler in flour or stews. By pealing the leaves you will find the “heart”, a white, tender section about 2-3 ft. below the “tail”. The heart is tender and less fibrous and can be cut up into a salad, baked or boiled. In winter the roots work well as a potato substitute.
Just write..plain and simple.
Since I’m your NEIGHBOR I’m here to let you know that your NEIGHBOR needs some help. This message is my flower pot and in order to get a flower you first must plant a seed. Before you leave here I want all able bodies to plant at least 1 seed into my life. The three types of seeds are.
Her Visions Lead Her To Danger
Jennifer – Tina Majorino
TONIGHT 4/16/2012 Insight Global, Inc. 59475 Recruiter/Account Manager Career All, Bus/Econ
The leaves start changing,
I recognize there are voices in our midst which would attempt to convince you that these truths are not applicable to our present-day conditions. If you listen and heed, you will be lured away from your principal obligations.
While earning his master's degree in American letters at Columbia, Tom worked part-time for the American Physical Society (APS), headquartered at the Pupin Physics Laboratory on the Columbia campus in New York City. Fahey, a 20-year-old secretary, was sitting at her desk reading a letter from her fiance, a Marine serving in Korea, when Bayard Peakes entered the office and emptied a clip of .22 caliber pistol shots into Fahey, killing her. Peakes then fled the campus.
Then I just felt plain old sad. Sad that this is how people see my culture, this is what will remain in the archives of the reaction to the single most significant military action in my life time. A bunch of kids, partying in the street like they'd just won the $25M bounty on his head.
Griffin’s first officially licensed trading cards will appear in Panini America’s 2012 Prestige Football product that is slated to release in June. In addition to traditional trading cards, Griffin also will be featured exclusively on the company’s pioneering HRX Video Trading Card technology, product packaging and in social media initiatives throughout the length of the agreement.
The purpose of the gathering was to put pressure on state legislators to vote for State Assembly bill A8800, which would allow churches to hold services in public schools. Other organizations are allowed to rent space in schools, and churches say they should not be discriminated against.
On this point John Calvin writes:
I'm taking you back in time to the December 2004 TJ newsletter for an old favorite technique of mine called Expressionistic Watercolor. What a fast, easy, and fun technique that will turn the most basic of projects into an explosion of artistic color.
But I didn’t. I just got up at my stop, glancing down to see that she was about three pages away from my piece. Perhaps it was for the best? She might not have even smiled once, and that would have killed me.
To help yourself along the way in this process, use only words of self empowerment, of self encouragement, coach yourself, be your own personal mentor (until you find one), speak only that which you want, and that which you can give. Speak only in terms of gratitude and speak like that whom is represented by who you will be once you achieve your goal.
.... I was a bit under the weather mid-week, and come Thursday when I was feeling better I had already arranged to have a stroll to the local cinema to see "War Horse" with my husband in the evening. God knows we see little enough of each other what with work, commuting, household chores and (in my case) crafting; so I decided for once to prioritise having some quality "couple" time and let my DT card slide lol! I think it must have done me good, cos when I finally sat down to it last night I felt quite in the mood to create.
Good reference here at k-punk , also Mark Fisher's book Capitalist Realism: is there no Alternative? has a great breakdown of the culture of surveylance in bureaucratic institutions.
Okay I get the use of the word “elite”…but “smart”? Yes I do believe the smart people should be in charge. That’s what the major complaint against Democrats and the religious wackjob wing of the Republican party is, that they’re morons. That intelligence is required to govern. That we need thought and reason and knowledge and virtue guiding us…not idiots who follow whims. I know what he’s trying to say…but the choice of the word “smart” instead of say “intelligentsia” or “ivory tower” or “arrogant” or any word to convey the appearance of intelligence without the existence of it, that would be fine…But “smart” in conjunction with his “college is for snobs” remark really scares me. I agree that the ivory tower elites who ponder ideas that have no basis in reality shouldn’t be in complete control, but that doesn’t mean education and intelligence are to avoided (as Santorum’s Freudian slips keep suggesting). If “aristocracy” literally means government by the best…what word means government by the dumbest (no, besides Obama)?
"After this," said the bright green and gold parrot, "never judge any one by his looks alone. You never can tell how often or where you may find concealed wings. You have lost the prize."
Legs & Co continue their rock interpretation sideline with the car insurance shilling choral wonder supposedly intended as the new Bohemian Rhapsody.
Jim Dixon, Lambeth cabinet member for health, said: “We have a lot less money than we used to and we need to make sure that everyone who’s got a pass needs one We’ll still be providing a much better service for mental health service users than most other boroughs.”
straight into the toilet,
But this is the town where both my children were born. The cathedral across the street from the Morrissons is where I was ordained – nearly 4,000 miles away from my hometown of Florence, SC, where I had assumed I would have been ordained at the civic centre (no, the SC Annual Conference doesn’t use churches).
Whatever the reason, it is nice to believe in future. I believe so, too. If there were good reason to start this world at the time of creation, then something good would result. That is how the system of causation works.
The next morning I asked if he had a chance to listen to the podcast. He said, "Yes, and I listened to five others." Since then he has completed all the podcasts from 2011 that interested him and loves telling me about each one. In fact, I discovered that there were a few that I missed and went back and listened to.
Hopeful that we'll drop a crumb. Hopeful that he can trick three people into feeding him dinner, one after the other. Hopeful that some kid will leave the bread on the counter, so he can sneak it out the dog door, eat up every morsel, and leave the plastic bag to crop up in a photograph.
What Child is This
I lovingly made each link of this necklace, connected and shaped them, while wishing for rain.
Upstairs in the eaves is another bar. A bit more pubby perhaps, but still trendy enough for those that need trendiness. If I was 30 odd years younger, I might call it cool, but I'm not, so I'll just content myself with "nice". I was there to see one of the stars of the brewing firmament, Garrett Oliver and a small but anticipatory crowd found seats and awaited the great man's arrival. Now, I have met Garrett a couple of times before and he is the most charming and articulate of exponents of the glories of beer. He is enthusiastic but doesn't gush as some do and has a very clear speaking voice. That was handy for us all of course, especially as drinks loosened standard British reserve. Still no whooping and high fives here though. In fact Garrett remarked that it was all rather quiet, but that didn't last.
I want to thank all of you who sent love, good wishes, prayers and positive energy my way over the past 6 weeks. I have felt so much love and support, so much awareness and understanding. I am getting used to my altered image in the mirror, and doing my work to figure out how to love it. It is a bit like learning to love stretch marks and loose skin after having kids. You know it was worth it, but it doesn't seem quite fair.
Gleick is known chiefly for his work on water issues, for which he enjoys a deserved reputation for his data-driven research (though he gets the remedies wrong). He has been as well a peripheral but aggressive figure in the climate wars, notable for the angry and politicized tone of his participation. Gleick is a member of the National Academy of Sciences and was, until two weeks ago, the chairman of an American Geophysical Union task force on scientific -ethics. He’s also a columnist for Forbes magazine’s website and a recipient of one of those MacArthur Foundation “genius” grants that typically go to the trendy and politically correct.
“We see it as a way to send out a message to show the Zimbabwean government that there are certain consequences to their abuse of human rights,” he said.
tend not to have such big hits. And then you get people who copy
so nature feeds the artist
Berkeley psychologists Paul Piff and Dacher Keltner ran several studies looking at whether social class (as measured by wealth, occupational prestige, and education) influences how much we care about the feelings of others. In one study, Piff and his colleagues discreetly observed the behavior of drivers at a busy four-way intersection. They found that luxury car drivers were more likely to cut off other motorists instead of waiting for their turn at the intersection. This was true for both men and women upper-class drivers, regardless of the time of day or the amount of traffic at the intersection. In a different study they found that luxury car drivers were also more likely to speed past a pedestrian trying to use a crosswalk, even after making eye contact with the pedestrian.
all the same, but the margins are mine:
struggling inwardly for composure, I asked quietly for his kardex.......
… and here it is.
Measurement of Hardness Scale
Sanjay Singhania (Aamir Khan), a man with anterograde amnesia, brutally kills a man, takes a picture of the victim, and write “done” on the image. Sanjay uses these photographs to aide him in remembering things in the past since his memory resets every after 15 minutes. Additionally, tattoos in his body, notes, labels on his drawers is helps him too.
The House of Representatives have a total of 44 black members which is the largest number on record. However, they may not transition to the Senate races. In fact only two blacks were found on the ballot for Senate seats. One C. Muse the strongest black candidate for a seat and who was predicted to win the seat came in a distant second to Sen. Ben Cardin according to CNN. “CNN found only one other African-American on a Senate ballot, a Florida candidate who isn’t getting much attention among a wide field of contenders.”
Parenting: Do we really need to be having children when we have to be reminded with public service announcements not to leave them in cars? Isn’t that sort of “The pot calling the kettle black?” I mean as a parent most won’t allow their children a pet because they won’t take care of it and the difference is…?
This will always be a favorite picture of mine, Lumi taking care of Ira. Sue is going to get some new pictures of Lumi in his new place, and I will be sure to post them. The babies here are almost shed out, and I want to show them off too!
When I play little games with my 16 month old son, I like to try teach him something, but at the least, make him laugh. I like it when he looks back at me with his little knowing smile, when he has discovered something new, and is showing off, using body language to say “look at me”. I try to get some of these moments everyday because they help make my day. It’s the most fun thing.
Hyun Bin, JYJ, Big Bang, Choi Ji Woo, Song Seung Hun, 2PM, Jang Geuk Suk, and Kim Hyun Joong came together as fairy-tale characters, and even sang a special song for the CF.
I'm sitting 186. Minor stall - been there about a week now.. :( I think it is all the stress, hopefully soon that keeps moving downward.
Adoniram Judson ‘hated his life in this world’ and was a ‘seed that fell into the ground and died.’ In his sufferings ‘he filled up what was lacking in Christ's afflictions’ in unreached Burma. Therefore his life bore much fruit and he lives to enjoy it today and forever. He would, no doubt, say: It was worth it.
There were two things that made the lightbulb in my head light up:
“P.I.M.P. (Remix)” – 50 Cent, Snoop Dogg, and Tony Yayo
Explicitly in most
So I head out to the world and prepare my mind
Cardigan: McGregor (vintage)
32.
Recall that in chapter fourteen, Kiwi rescued (I should note that the girl he rescued wasn't really drowning; she was fooling around) a girl at the World of Darkness pool where he is working as a lifeguard. In this chapter, the media swarms on the story, portraying him as a hero. He is interviewed and photographed or the newspaper:
If City do not win the title and Mancini is still in charge next season this shows a great degree of loyalty from the Abu Dhabi based owners, something which is not expected from rich owners trying to make teams into an instant success. As demonstrated at Chelsea under their billionaire owner Roman Abramovich, if a manager does not win something they are immediately replaced. However, City’s owners appear to have a different philosophy, hiring only one manager during their involvement with the club.
Before I go on, I just wanted to check and make sure... you guys knew that Saint Gianna was a doctor, right? Good! Just wanted to be on the safe side and state the obvious there. :-)
“Samething,” the debut 2012 single from the duo RoxiRock, rooted in reggae, combines a mix of soulful vocals, percussive drum and bass, keyboard, and rhythmic guitar lines. This original song is about the challenges young people face today, conveyed through “breezy” melodies and a driving rhythm section.
Sorry dad but maybe the realization of this makes a little difference.
Never surrender to anyone, even if you are certain that they are better than you.
Instead, I am sharing some of the best things I've read this week by my fellow bloggers.
Who am I?
People need to be noticed, to be seen as valid participants in society, to be needed by somebody else in meaningful ways. People need to be seen and feel valued, not just noticed in a distracted way, in passing glances whilst we whizz along doing other things we find important.
Last year I went as an author but this year I am going as a reader just because well they had limited space and I am no where in the ilks of big name authors, ie: Sherriyln Kenyon and Lora Leigh, to sit in a signing.
So the Pharisees and Lawyers were quite right: Who alone can forgive but God? Or, Who alone will forgive but God? Maybe Jesus made this announcement about the man’s sins publicly for just that reason. Maybe was inviting others to see forgiveness for what it was: Grace. The man had done nothingto merit forgiveness. Grace is God’s prerogative and He shows it to whomever He desires. Dare we have the courage to publicly proclaim God’s message of Grace for all to hear?
“We are very excited to house the fine work of Ed Abbey,” said Greg Thompson, Associate Dean of the Special Collections at the Marriott Library. “It is a collection we’re proud to have at the University.”
But I mentioned to Daphna Baram that I thought Israel’s image in the UK had mainly gone downhill since my erstwhile youth largely because of accents.
Take the Money and Run
2. Rock Bottom Riser (6:27)
The clouds and the
I went white. Cool. Crisp. Fruity. It’s summer in a glass. I used a Sauvignon Blanc because it’s one of my favorite white wines. Use what you like. The pineapple adds a summer sweetness that makes you wish your feet were bare and in the sand. And if you can wait until the end of the glass, the wine soaked fruit will have you licking your fingers and wanting more. Maybe well-mannered people use a fork. But I don’t know any of those.
In this first clip on YouTube we see a section from one edition of the Nancy Grace show where the lacrosse case is discussed, at the beginning she appears almost rational, until she starts bullying one of her minions over what she perceives as over familiarity with the accused, by, for instance referring to one by his first name. Later in the clip she explodes in fury when a guest she interviews has the temerity to suggest the accused might be innocent. Note the contrast between how he is bullied and heckled with the respectful silence in which the following guest, a black female anti rape activist, is allowed to speak without interruption.
Here’s to the leader within each of us!
Ex. 2: I should be exempt from the English requirement because my experience as an office assistant and apprentice has already provided me with equivalent writing knowledge.
This giveaway is only open to US and Canadian residents! I'm sorry that I am not able to offer this up to international residents! But look out for more awesome giveaways including the Clutch That giveaway which will be open to all!
Mix well all the dry ingredients in a bowl except the last two: cranberries and 1 tablespoon of flour. In a separate bowl mix well the clementine zest and all the wet ingredients except the last two: cranberries and 1 tablespoon of flour. Add the wet ingredients into the dry ingredients, fold 3-4 times with a rubber spatula, it won't be mixed well at this stage. Into the halved cranberries bowl toss 1 tablespoon of flour mix lightly and quickly and add to the batter. Fold the batter few more times until lumpy. Do not over mix.
Hex hears the shots and realizes they are coming from the livery. More shots are fired and Hex climbs out the window and drops to the ground to investigate.
The Chair will be named after Yossi Harel, a founding figure in the history of modern Israel. Harel, who died in 2008 aged 90, commanded the ship Exodus 1947, which carried more than 4,500 displaced European Jews to Palestine. The 1947 blockade of the vessel by Britain prompted the United Nations to vote in favour of the creation of the state of Israel.
Shoelaces - can be used to attempt suicide by hanging
I'm continuing to take my time in all of this but the journey seems to go on with a life of its own. I say I am not "doing anything" to transition but I am allowing myself to be myself and that fact... me being true and honest to myself is materialized as becoming the female I am inside. Apparently my walk has changed, my mannerisms, my gesticulations, my speech patterns... in essence... everything. I'm not aware of any changes at all but am told so constantly by everyone else. It is quite a revelation to not fully be aware of changes in one's own sense of self and to consider that what has changed as being completely different from what actually has. It is all so odd.....
I now earn more than I ever have done in my life yet I'm perpetually poor - in fact I often feel like I have less money than ever. This is partly because I have finally paid off my long standing student overdraft (all £1,600 of it) and also am saving money rather aggresively.
At least I'm floating free
I read the excerpt of the book and was immediately sold when I saw Smoked Salmon and Cream Cheese Omelet....Mmmm! Sounds good, right? Yea, you know it does!
But having this many children is refining, to both John's character and mine, and we wouldn't trade it for anything. The ups definitely outweigh the downs and we feel so blessed we have been given this opportunity to raise and care for these special spirits of God He has sent to us. And here, I want to share a few photos of John doing his thing with the kids. This is entirely the norm, every week.... every day.... and sometimes every hour..... and John loves it, haha, most of the time!
Anissa Helou, a food writer I was first introduced to via her beautiful Mediterranean Street Food cookbook years ago, has a great blog that exposes little bits of the world of Middle Eastern food that we'd probably never be privy to without her. (She also features a Belly Dancer of the Month, so obviously, she has my heart.) Today's post tells us about a story she's written for the March issue of Saveur on Iranian food (you can bet I'll be picking this up), and she included a couple videos of Iranian bakers in action. It's worth checking out: I love how fluidly and rhythmically the three men in the top clip move through each other's space, just like interconnected cogs in a machine.
Besides, conversation is pointless – we mouth smiled greetings at one another.
Linguine (angel hair pasta) and Clam Sauce with salad (asparagus for the boys) and garlic bread
Location: Los Angeles, California, USA
I think, emotionally.… It definitely took its toll. Definitely,It’s the human experience,of any death. You know, that’s what the heart does. Things are given to us, and things are taken away. And I think the heart becomes stronger, more capable. I look at him as the one of the few people I was able to listen to growing up as a child, he grew up with so many of us and that was my first album that my father bought me willingly! ( INSERT A SCREAM FACE HERE )
We have been having so much fun! Adalea is so happy. She is so alert and attentive to everything around her...she doesn't want to miss a beat. I think that is why nap time is sometimes a challenge :) Enjoy the pictures.
But, there’s a twist. Your project must included at least one Cricut cut and at least one of the critters that have been hidden within some of the bug stop blogs. Be sure to visit all the bug stops to find all your critter choices.
Parent Initials: Parent approves the child’s homework.
Fortunately the team have a chubby guy so he is able to explain that La Sangre de Dios is a ghost town where the infamous wrestler and insane killer, El Mascarado (Rey Misterio), was banished for, well, being an insane killer. This raises my first question; how exactly does one banish someone to a ghost town? I can only assume that the banishee isn’t keen on this arrangement so how precisely is the banishment maintained? This first question pales into insignificance when the rest of the tale comes to light. El Mascarado, it turns out, was assembled from the miscellaneous body parts of the world’s greatest wrestlers in order to create the ultimate, unbeatable wrestler to compete in the ’68 Olympics. (So many questions). He never made it to the Olympics because before he even made it through the qualifying stages he went somewhat mental and started tearing people’s faces off rather than making the concerted effort necessary to secure Olympic gold.
I think I can safely say....she had it set up and connected with friends by 9:30 or so! Her birthday request...a cell phone! So many of her friends already have one....she wanted one too. I'm not sure we agree that she NEEDS one; not sure we agree that all kids SHOULD even have one or if so, what age that should be. But, thus far, she's been very responsible with using Greg's old one we kept active when he got his one from work. And it's proven very helpful to me for her to have one...the logistics of having small boys who are challenging to get in and out of places at various times and/or who have a hard time tolerating certain places can be complicated; her having a phone on her gives us more freedom at times to keep life moving. And what tipped the scale in her favor is that one of her friends has hearing challenges and texting is the best way for Morgan to stay in contact with her since they don't go to school together. So...I guess you can say Morgan is now happily "connected"
Marina Bay Sands, Singapore
GOP Chairman Steve Robertson said having Democratic President Barack Obama at the top of the ballot this fall could provide a boost to all GOP candidates in Kentucky in the Nov. 6 general election in a state where Democrats outnumber Republicans 1.6 million to 1.1 million.
Ghosts in the machine who believe they’re alive, ten thousand space stations, each with its own government or political system, a woman whose only hope for survival is an instant decapitation: these are just a few of the big ideas floating around in Alastair Reynolds’ the Prefect.
52 Go back to the main scene and give the start screen movie clip the Instance name startScreen_mc.
At first, I wrote novels for adults. Three such completed novels are gathering dust underneath my bed, as the saying goes. In between, I wrote for young readers. I have a better than average imagination. When I recognized this strength, I knew I had found my niche.
Oh well, since there doesn't seem to be much else happening in my life at the moment, I shall have to stick with the birds. Two gorgeous, but slightly different yellow-rumped warblers - can you spot the difference?
MILLIPEDE (above right)
Some of us have a chronic headache problem and we are dependent on painkillers. I have learnt a way and tried for my sinus headaches, it worked in reducing the painkillers by 80%. Here I will show you the point and explain the procedure.
-you weigh 36 pounds and are 37 inches tall and wear a size 3T-4T
So, look for some new projects coming soon :) I am anxious to get back to my stamp room and doing what I love best....creating and sharing with my friends!
1 tablespoon dry sherry
David Bishop (@Broadfordbrewer) has been quite busy as of late with his garage brewing. He's given me four samples of his recent home brews, and to be honest, he's put a lot of hard work into these, and his recent home brewing in general. He asked me to let him know what I really thought, so instead of writing a couple of (slightly impersonal) 140 character tweets, I thought I'd let him really know what I think here.
Vision training is a form of physical therapy for the brain and the eyes. It is a more extensive form of eye exercise and requires more frequent visits.
age -- before Hathaway, in fact -- thanks to the late great
Limited option clauses are imperative for authors who want to write for several houses, in different genres, or for two different markets—like adult vs. children’s.
Third, Gary and I could not spend much of today together, as he always has an extra-long work day on Wednesdays. So I am about to have a frozen Amy's meal for an anniversary dinner. By myself. Ah, but don't feel too badly for me. We will go out to celebrate next week when many Valley of the Sun restaurants are participating in Restaurant Week. And there are several ones I would love to go to, so it will be interesting picking out the one to celebrate at. Most of these restaurants offer a fixed-price, 3-course menu for $30 or $40 per person. Some even throw in a free glass of house wine. Woohoo! I am really looking forward to a great meal at a nice place.
Many managers are reluctant to try the use of scheduling software to increase staff efficiency. Managers may be comfortable with their established routine, or may fear that part of their job is being taken away from them. However, once managers see how computer programs save time, create efficiencies, and allow staff to work closer to the revenue line, even the most stubborn among them may become converts.
Not only did this course that my father had purchased help my memory, it was something that fostered my imagination as well.
The last time I'd been there was when I had dropped off 10 pieces for them....so I hadn't gotten to see everything up on display. Needed to get a pic of that!!
For the past two years now, the USDA has culled geese within a seven-mile radius of John F. Kennedy and LaGuardia airports. Under a plan supported by Mayor Michael Bloomberg, USDA agents killed 1,509 wild geese in parks throughout New York City and 167 more in Long Island in 2010. Last year, 575 geese were killed.
~ Mother Teresa
this was sean's favorite excursion, but not mine.
The present writer believes that the way to go is to reinforce the aam admi Hindu, the traditional acharyas, gurus and maths, rather than undermining them by subtle methods and often openly downgrading them in various ways. They have been the backbone of our civilisation. We tinker with them at our own peril. Protecting them and preserving them is the task for contemporary Hindus. This can and should be accompanied by a determined effort to “defeat” the enemy, rather than accommodate him/her. Some writers have argued that Hindus are being exposed on a daily basis to Western ideas and so why not be prepared for this onslaught by further exposure? In the opinion of the present writer this is a mistaken strategy, because it invites a new kind of Macaulayism. Macaulay effected his strategy of enslaving Hindus to Western thought by fiat. Malhotra and Clooney have adopted a different strategy, that of Hindu Christian Dialogue, in which the Hindu is programmed into thinking that he or she is obligated to engage with the adversary, in the interests of some “higher” cause.
After I took the requested photo, I asked if he'd like me to send it to Gigi, and he said no, mama, I want you to show ALL your friends. Little does he know I have a very convenient outlet for doing so:
I am going to hang it from ribbon at our event coming up to display pictures! I think this would be great for Christmas or Birthday Cards too! This took me no time to make....about 20 minutes to be exact! I may go back later and add some color to it by painting the tops of the clothespins with alternating colors....but we shall see!
bashing the chicken pieces flat
From Latin purgātōrium: cleansing. Cognate to English (purge): Tending to cleanse or purge.
But I think we can go further with a properly written down model. We can explore the circumstances under which the scion is actually preferred over other candidates.
So, whew. I didn't realize it had gotten so tight. I'll be heading down more often for a pint, just to make sure the calm weather continues. (Blazer fans take note: as soon as the NFL's regular season ends, Roots will be showing games, and possibly offering that burger and a pint for $10 deal.)
He sighed deeply. In his case too it was love at first sight. He has lost his heart the moment he saw that creature blessed with divine beauty looking at him.
The world will not recognize us, for it did not recognize Jesus when He came.
Radiant is more true
Seriously, even though that is not an inaccurate answer, the best time to get coverage is at the earliest possible moment when it is both financially feasible and practical, even though there may not be an obvious need at the moment. The only result of procrastination is that health and circumstances can change, affecting eligibility. Why, then, do breadwinners wait until it is too late?
Every one had their theory
Amongst other things we had a wall built to make another room
It's really not a critique of either poet, or artist, but of this larger and more pervasive lack of self-awareness about this (having an all-male discourse) being a choice. A tactical, if unconscious, manoeuvre that one needs to address...
Location Chronic Fatigue Syndrome Advisory Committee (CFSAC) or -FROM HOME!
“We are focused on supporting the individual and providing complete support to meet each community member’s needs during this transition,” said Sirianni. “To that end, we are planning for a robust communications and training plan for this migration to the new email platform.”
She said she contacted authorities after she found out the return flight information was fake. By then, her ex-husband’s apartment had been cleaned out. She said she later got a text message from him saying he was not coming back.
Primera Division Campeonato de Apertura 2012, third round
I’ve been doing a lot of posts lately on delicious and healthful foods. Have you noticed my affinity for lentils this month? I’m either using up the beans in my kitchen or cleaning through my pantry or both.
Love…. from a distance…. and pray for those involved… but take care of “you” so you can take care of those God puts in your path.
Hey there Mr. Blue
So I wrote a book on manners, one on sacrificial love, and then I asked a few people that are influences in the girls' lives or people that I have reaped wisdom from over the last several years to contribute a life lesson. I also asked them to pick a character to represent themselves in the story, and then I wrote a book full of short stories around those life lessons.
"We are almost there," he said to himself and the baby in his arms.
Our reading is coming on though. I’ve read The Baby Book pretty much from cover to cover, and last week read through The Vaccine Book. There’s a lot of info to take in there. Karl needs to read that one now, & then we need to go through it together & decide on which vaccines to get. We know that childhood diseases can be devastating, and that vaccines have done an amazing job of eradicating some of them (at least for those of us in the developed world), but vaccines themselves aren’t without their problems, so we’re going to decide on each one of them on it’s own merits. It seems more sensible than an all or nothing approach. Though having read the book, I’m utterly appalled at the vaccines that are grown in monkey kidney cells and fetal cow serum! Since that one’s just for a stomach bug, I think we’ll be giving it a miss.
I find myself playing this one anytime I have nothing to do and have my iPad close at hand. It's addictive, has a good deal of depth, and is outright fun to play. Pick this one up and splurge on the expansion. It's worth it!
( And yes, I thought up this test and post and title while hiking. Silence is dangerous mind material.)
this concept at first. Why would I pay more than what was listed on the menu? And tipping varies from customer to customer.. there is no way to regulate it. Just tell me how much, so I won’t be surprised when my $15 meal turns into $25.
Whoa...what's this about another creative outlet?
Another Little Quilt Swap hosted by Kate North. This is my second quilt swap with Kate and her talented followers. Kate is an organized and enthusiastic hostess and so far, the quilts I've seen for this swap on her blog are gorgeous with a capital G!!
We need to close the circle to understand the role of the high-powered individuals in charge of this policy.
Joe Hill – Thumbprint
With that said I am not gonna sit and play on my laptop I’m going to bid you farewell and go and enjoy more of My City that which is Cape Town.
You can also search out names or phrases that have low competition for searches that you could take over fairly easily as well.
Yes High School was a difficult time. So much was happening as the war in Vietnam was winding down and the social movements were still in full swing. Only problem was the drug scene was making its way through teenagers at a faster rate than women’s liberation. What’s a boy to do? Luckily for me I did find a few friends. First there was Yury (Zhivago) and Alexis (Zorba) and that English guy named Copperfield and I moved on to Lord Jim and of course my favorite (Heart of Darkness). I do remember many lazy afternoons when I was once again not doing my homework. Instead I would stretch out on my bed and read The Hobbit and The Lord of the Rings while listening to Crosby Stills Nash and Young (4 Way Street) over and over and over again. Of course reading J.R.R. Tolkien ruined my singing voice as I tried to get the dwarf tunes down pat.
The player I had fouled remained on the floor, looking surprised and disappointed that I had not been booked. What was once soil had been eroded into a fine brownish-grey sand. It clung to the kangaroo leather of his white Joma football boots, as well as covering most of the penalty area Hythe were about to attack. The free-kick, forty yards out from our goal, got the faintest of flicks off a head and into the back of our net. I had my suspicions about their number eleven from the start. He didn't let me down. Rather than congratulate his colleagues, he jogged alongside me on his way back to the half-way line. “Cheers mate, that's your fault,” he told me. For a brief moment I tried to summon up the wit of Oscar Wilde, but seeing as we were already winning by three goals to one, I made do with telling him to fuck off. He spent much of the game telling our centre-half, Ryan Hurst, how he was going to dribble around our defence and score. The wait continues.
Which brings me to my next point, and I will make this one short and sweet. If you do not have respect for John Cena after that brutal match last night, you should give up on being a fan now. Last night, John Cena gave the fans exactly what they have wanted him to do for months. He went rogue. The fans have been calling for John to do something different with his character since last year. With the story leading up to and culminating at Extreme Rules last night, Cena did just that. He did not play the role of “Super Cena” these past few weeks and last night. John instead was vulnerable and desperate. He went to the extreme to protect what was his, even though he knew that Lesnar was out for blood. Cena went into that ring last night and performed his ass off for you. He left everything he had in that ring, and that should be more than enough for the fans. Now, before you get all high and mighty on me, I said respect, mind you. Respecting Cena does not need to encompass liking Cena. Nor do you have to be happy with his win over Lesnar. All I am saying is that as wrestling fans, you should damn well show some respect for John Cena. As a man and a pro-wrestler. He has earned it. He has nothing left to prove.
*NOTE: For the purpose of this article, my use of the word Church, includes all denominations, all those who have called on the name of Jesus for salvation. The use of the word church, will be replaced with local assembly or local congregation.
Calling! God has placed a calling in our hearts, on the depth of our soul is a calling. Never doubt God that you are called just to be born and die (sabi nga, isang marka ka lang sa census ng Pilipinas)! We all have a calling – never doubt that. We are far better people called by God to unleashed our potentials. He has a plan for us better than our plans for ourselves. So it follows that no heartaches, rejection, past, and fear can hinder that calling. May paglalagyan ka!
The Story of Variety with Michael Grade comes to the conclusion that live Variety was killed off in the mid-to-late-1950s by a combination of television, scheduling rock stars in Variety stage shows (which split the audience into two groups, neither of which were fully satisfied) and adding strippers (which destroyed the appeal for family audiences). But this did not kill off the acts, merely the places they were showcased. Sunday Night at the London Palladium thrived on ITV in the 1950s and 1960s.
I even have a book whose title poem is about raspberries, part of which I will reproduce here for your pleasure:
The district court erred in concluding that the language at issue in claim 1 was means-plus-function language that invoked § 112 ¶ 6. . . . The functional language defines the size and shape of the claimed holes. The interior of the holes must be shaped to allow pins to slide through axially while the boundaries of the holes must be sized appropriately to hold the pins in place and limit their movement across the plane of the plate. The claim language makes clear that the structure for performing these functions is the holes themselves.
We've heard it from parents, maybe teachers. Interesting to note that in this context "place" has nothing to do with physical space and everything to do with social behavior.
you saw something in me so you called me yours
We can see to the Atlantic Ocean.
Tom’s motives for breaking it off with Allison made a lot of sense when you think about his character. This is a man who is chivalrous to the core and even when Allison attempted to seduce him, he knew it wasn’t the right time to have sex with her. Tom also knew how to get Allison from making a big mistake when she faced off with Golda as well.
Strangely enough I am cut by a double blade. In one side I am extremely happy that this form of art will be more and more recognized, loved and shared even in fashion shows, exclusive hotels, private homes and events. In the other hand I become so sad when I think about it. I get often tears in my eyes. My doubts are that in some extent it Will loose the poetry, freedom, beauty and spontaneity that it has allways had and should continue having. It is obvious that I hope for this artists to be’ able to make a living out of their talent and to feel the satisfaction of seeing their work of art be loved, bought, shared and recognized.
Between last Monday and last Thursday, it became clear that the investigation would be a serious one, overseen by a group of police chiefs from around the state. That, apparently, was all Catotti needed to know: she was the only member of the Council to vote against authorizing an investigation.
Chances are not good that money will simply come along, not in huge amounts, no matter how hard we work. Though Americans rank high among those believing in the ability to get ahead, the facts say otherwise. A 2011 report by the Organization of Economic Cooperation and Development placed the U.S.tenth in social mobility among industrialized countries. The report noted that a nation’s inequality of wealth impacts its citizens’ ability to improve their lot; the greater the inequality, the greater the difficulty. Brookings Institution economist Isabel Sawhill agrees and adds, “Inequality in one generation may mean less opportunity for the next generation to get ahead and thus, still more inequality in the future.”
You'll have until 9pm PDT each day to leave your comment and the winners
We’ll both dance cruel on his shaking bones
I would love to go back and stay for a few days and get up each morning and wander the lanes and courtyards of Carmel. Maybe stay with Clint at his Mission Ranch or the in-town Hotel that is owned by Doris Day...wonder if Gig Young is there..... OK, you have to be a certain age to understand that reference.
Comedy Central has pushed the envelope in the past: the long-running South Park features Christ as a regular character.
Walking in one Saturday someone said hi to us as they walked by, and we smiled and said hi back.
Just last week Barb from Babs Just a Babblin showed a ceramic berry basket that she was going to buy from Anthropologie. This little number called to me. A seventies ceramic project. How do I know?... I also did ceramics in the seventies.
Here are my favorites.
Do you want to fundamentally transform your country? Yup, him too.
Plenty of parking.
yes I would rather spend it
For this card, I chose a Saturated Canary digi called So Sorry. How appropriate, huh? I used a sentiment from Stampin' Up Always in My Thoughts. Card stock is also by Stampin' Up. The design paper is Authentique Uncommon. Dies used are: Spellbinders Fancy Tags, Cheery Lynn Sofia's Heart Doily, and a Magnolia Doohickey flourish. The image was colored with Copics: YR20, E0000, E000, E00, E11, E13, E31, E35, YG91, YG95, YG97, W3, R00, R11, R14, R81, R83, R85, RV0000, RV000, RV00. I accented the image with a Signo Uniball white gel pen; I also applied Glossy Accents to her tears, eyes, and lips. Flowers are by Prima and Wild Orchid Crafts.
Serve to any lecherous man within five-inch heel walking distance.
This experience connected us, but we’ve always been connected by the greater human experience.
Mom and Dad message each other
5) they follow whoever… You know those random ppl who start to follow you even though you’ve said nothing all day and BAM 5 new followers who when looking at bio have nothing to do with anything in yours ……
Sweating, stressed and not even nearly amused we walked back to the van to get the puppy out and you can imagine my surprise when I opened the door and couldn't see her - she was gone! We ran round the garden trying to find where she had gone searching high and low, in the chicken shed, under all the bushes, behind the house, I eventually heard a faint cry and ran over to find that she had sniffed out a dead rabbit in the corner of the garden and obviously drawn to it by the awful smell had took a step too many any tumbled into the brambles. She was now completely hidden by the thorny bushes and the nettles! Jean scrambled through the brambles and rescued Elf who was quickly taken indoors and out of harms way!!
Up to May 20th A GROWING ABUNDANCE OF SUPERIOR SYNCHRONICITIES (emotional compatibility is called synastry)
and her bunions.
Homophobic. Islamaphobic. Xenophobic. Phobia, phobia, phobia…
Basically, Erdogan’s economic growth is just a Muslim version of the US after 2004: cheap money that should’ve been capped and cooled down has been allowed to rip ahead in order to enable re-election. But it can’t last much longer.
xxx in spring
I can be happy one minute.
SHE walks in beauty, like the night
When it comes to shopping for kids clothing, I don’t think any store can beat Target for its overall combination of price, design and product quality not only in the U.S. but also in other parts of the world. I’m sure there are a ton of as cute or cuter items found at many other stores, but I can almost guarantee that the original prices cannot compete with Target. Target has never disappointed me with its children’s swim selections. I like the coral pink color swimsuits for girls. I find the color prettier than a typical tone of hot pink.
When a man (as it would have been in those olden days) worked hard in the shipyards or mines six days a week, and spent his hard-earned money taking his family to the theatre or music hall on a Saturday, there was some merit in reviews which helped him choose his entertainment; his shillings would not be wasted on inferior shows.
It’s a 2012 Kia Rio5, right off the boat from Korea. My impression of Kia was they are cheap and unsafe, but this car is quite nice. It’s got all sorts of bells and whistles for electronics, does fantastic on gas and has a 5 star safety rating. To top it off, Kia has a FANTASTIC warranty.
First four songs are from Divine Facing, remaining two are from Fireborn.
Representatives of over 90 countries, including such places as China, Japan, Phillipines, Vietnam, Oman, Korea, Malaysia, Canada, Iceland, Scotland, Mexico, and Chile, attend this event. You'll also find representatives of a number of U.S. states, including places like Alaska, Florida, North Carolina, Louisiana, and Georgia. You can "visit" many different countries and regions yet never leave Boston. As you walk down the aisles, you will hear various languages spoken, and the diverse peoples seem to get along quite well. Maybe this should be a lesson for all international relations.
Title: The Corruptible
BFHU: Well it would be blasphemy if mere men “took God’s rightful title away from Him and gave it to a man.” But, Jesus is the one Who changed Simon’s name to ROCK. God is very generous.
Like exclusive things? Then shop accessories here!. Replica Chanel watches of all models are sold in our store cheaper.
3. Poverty? When I was really small, whenever my parents gave me good food I’d think that something bad was coming up, like we would run out of money very soon; cause I always heard them discussing about money so I was really scared. Not anymore I guess.
My rationale for applying is laid out in my application letter below:
Diane Figures she pieced about 20 QOV's per year, but machine quilts 50 to 100!!
Some other bird species on my list include;
with no drowning. He has gone to its fiesta.
WE APPEAL to the United Nations to assist the Jewish people in the building-up of its State and to receive the State of Israel into the comity of nations.
I am haunted by an eyeless cat I met this weekend. We didn't need to go to Petsmart, but we were shopping nearby, and The Geej wanted to go "see the animals." There are always adoption events on the weekends put on by various local animal rescue groups, and generally there are a fair number of cats, kittens, puppies and dogs you can interact with, and some you can even hold or pet. They had moved the canine adoption candidates inside the entryway of the store because of the heat. It was crowded and unfortunately, for the dogs and for us, it wasn't very easy to interact with or even see the puppies. We made our way inside, and halfway down the main aisle, there were tables with cages set up on them, and in the cages were cats and kittens ready to be adopted. Each cage had a laminated page attached to it that gave the cat's name and some information about it. The second cage held the eyeless cat. Full grown with a coat of long, cream-colored fur, she sat perched in her little fabric hammock that hung from the cage's four corners, quietly alert. She listened and sniffed. I could see the tiny corners of her pink nose moving as she took in every smell that passed her. The Geej looked at the cat and asked in slight alarm, "Where are her eyes?" I read the information page aloud to her: Ophelia. Born with a genetic eye defect. A stray. Part of a feral colony. Repeated infections. Unable to save the eyes. Recently removed. Don't feel sorry for her because she has adapted amazingly.
Mario Kart is the hands down #1 Mario spin-off. There have been Mario Kart games released for handheld systems like the Game boy Advance and Nintendo 3DS. The classic Mario Kart’s on the N64 and GameCube is where it is at. Mario Kart puts Mario and his crew behind the wheel of go karts and lets them race to the finish. It is no simple three lap race though. There are items that you can pick up along the way. Some of them include, shells that you can throw at other divers and bananas that you can place down, in hope that your opponent drives over it and spins off the track. Mario Kart first started off as one person behind the wheel. Then Mario Kart Double Dash was released on the GameCube that featured two drivers on one cart. One driver would throw the items and the other would drive the cart, you could switch back and forth between drivers as well. Each character has a special item, similar to special shots in Mario Tennis. The courses are awesome as well. Courses take place in deserts, jungles and even on top of Daisy’s Cruiser. Yes, you get to drive on a yacht in the middle of the ocean.
Anushka Sharma has been named the brand icon of the year at an award function in Gurgaon. At the NDTV Good Times Gadget Guru Awards, the actress was honored as the celebrity endorser of Reliance Communications Limited.
And speaking of beef, we went with the Arrachera, a marinated flank steak, grilled and served on tortillas. You can have the fillings (mentioned above, plus chicken and vegetarian) in tacos, tortas (sandwiches) or tamales at $10 per.
It’s a good way to make sure I spend long enough cleaning my teeth though, because every time I do it, I find something else to puzzle over and it’s a conundrum I’m never likely to know the answer to.
We decided our best course of action would be to head south to the bridge, then follow a trail as far south as we could before turning back north and following the river with the sun at our backs, both for the best photos, but also for the best light to view the birds at.
“They may wind up getting sued and getting hit with hundreds of thousands of dollars in legal fees and damages,” said Berger. “Who will pay is every member of the association, and they will have to make special assessments.().It’s a cautionary tale for other associations.” Located about six miles west of downtown Sanford, the 6-year-old Retreat at Twin Lakes contains about 200 two-story town homes.
Salt - as required
Eight young Muslim terrorists on active service from Birmingham, London and Luton, were arrested in Aden in December 1998, planning terror attacks against British targets. The security services then claimed they had no idea that Muslim soldiers were being recruited in British mosques and trained in terror camps. Do we believe them?
Because, in this case, to fight is to live? Yeah, okay...shut up you fuckin conscience, I wasn't askin you! In other words, if I stop fighting, I'll just feel dead and won't want to live anymore?... Dam you! Shut the fuck up I just said! I was asking my reader(s?)! Why the hell should I even bother living when there's hardly one person in every couple hundred thousand people who want the Machine to disappear from the face of the Earth and the rest just basically want to keep "benefiting" in some way or another from this global rapefest, aka civilization? Ha! Got you now, you conscience! Can't say fuck all now, can you?! Hhhmmmm...yep! you got me! But you know you'll keep fightin anyways...you do realize that, do you? Fuck off, conscience! Just, fuck off!
When asked if she had felt angered at Gary telling her she may not win the competition after she was accused of bullying fellow contestants on live TV, she said: “I’ve got the utmost respect for Gary – I think he’s amazing. I understand what he was saying.”
‘God, I didn’t ask for more. Just let us like this. Happy with our life and love each other like this. I didn’t need anything else.’ Junsu pray
The pickin’s include rugs, furniture and votive candles.
The presence of a threadbare hair bobble around his white ponytail did throw me off (er, head of a $10 billion Chanel empire?) but perhaps that was a mere ruse; much like his male model security detail (swoon!) and the bevy of bespectacled clones (Klones?) dispatched amongst the crowd. Clever trick there Mr. L. Clever indeed.
Challenge #5: Create a layout or card using buttons. Dig into your stash and scrap! Email your creation to me at thynner5@yahoo.ca or link it below for a ballot to win the $50.00 Gift Code.
To make sure the message was delivered, L2′s lawyer emailed the chief of staff for the White House Office of Science and Technology:
Still, the project was passed with no major concessions, so the developer has to be pleased. Then again, the courts may have some significant say in the project’s future.
A few weeks ago Sweet Pea helped me get this part of the side yard ready for the coop. I was so glad we already had that part done. The coop itself was easy to assemble, it was the leveling of the ground and putting the coop up on the 4x4 frame that was hard.
He will be going with me.
Sadness…it is a sheath that envelopes, a tangled bundle not to be unwrapped,
First we went to Sinebrychoff Park to sit out with friends and so on. It was actually rather cold and windy that day, so my mood wasn't the highest at the moment because I was wearing shorts.
Of course when one gets into the finer points of detail in Revelation, I’m going to have something to say about it. Some of the conclusions that he makes are lacking. For instance, he points out differences between Ezekiel 38-39 and Revelation 20:7-9 to show that these cannot be the same events. Those who have been reading my blog for some time know my position. Ezekiel 38-39 must be divided into two distinct sections. Ezekiel 38:1-7 and all of chapter 39 are pre-millennial while Ezekiel 38:8-23 is post-millennial lining up flawlessly with Revelation 20:7-9 occurring “after many days” which is the millennium, see Ezekiel 38:8. Demonstrating differences in a passage does not always prove them to be completely different, but sometimes complementary. Concerning the physical coming of Christ, he places this after the bowls rather than before (see Revelation 14:14-16) because of the reference in Revelation 16:15 that Christ comes like a thief. This is completely lacking in substance since Revelation 16:15 is not a time indicator, but a warning that Christ will come like a thief. Similar warnings are given at Revelation 22:12, 20 significantly after Christ has physically returned. Finally, he separates the onset of the millennium from the new heavens and new earth placing them after the millennium. He doesn’t articulate his reasons for this view, but simply sets them forth. Readers here understand my view that Isaiah 65-66 and Revelation 21 to be speaking of a new heavens and new earth which occur in conjunction with the millennial kingdom.
I am in limbo. I’ve been like it for months; floundering, poised up on the top of the hill in my barn, I sit at the island and look out in a state of suspended animation. I am still waiting for the bilateral TMJ replacement surgery. Sorry, I’m conditioned to the medical terminology after a year of injections, investigations and unsuccessful surgery. What I mean is both jaws are to be completely replaced.
Today the birds are singing in full chorus. The leaves are unfurling and the scenery is changing into a light green sea of newness. We spied butterflies on our morning walk to school; and saw a few more flowers opening up to the sun and warmer air. The sensation of being outside is lighter – and that is not only because I left my coat at home, hanging up in the closet. The birdsong and the distant scent of blossoming jasmine has awakened more than just my senses. The higher temperature has brought a swing to my step; and pedestrians are looking up instead of bowing their head against the wind and cold.
In the end I sorted out which bulbs will probably not survive, though I replanted them in the contaminated pot, which I hope I’ve cleared of bugs. The healthy-looking bulbs I’ve planted in another pot, with my fingers crossed. Then I remembered that last week there’d been a maze of tiny fruit-fly sized flies around the adjacent Thai basil. Were the two things connected? Spotting some more of the flies I zapped them with common house fly spray.
The days of the bouncy seat are long gone. You're way too big for it and even if you weren't you're just not impressed anymore.
Justin Saxton, English Democrats 243 (9.0%)
God’s Word
Today it’s electronics; at least, it is in my case. I operate a home office which is dependent upon the use of my computer. My old standby crashed almost a year and a half ago in the middle of manuscript submission and I purchased a new computer. It is usually my habit when some machine or another in the office goes bad to cart it out to the curb for pickup. Usually, some neighbor driving by gets to it before the county does. This time my husband, Richard, said he wanted the old computer. So, I called a repairman and had it overhauled and then let Richard have it.
How talented they are, my once little girls. How much my heart thuds with pride these days. How I have to hide it with a brisk 'That was lovely, dear.' How I love my beautiful young people.
13. Get Ready
Hearst Ranch has two ranches based in San Simeon and Cholame, California. They offer grass fed steaks, Iliamna Alaskan Wild Red Salmon, and Heritage American Bronze Turkeys, to name a few. They even sell their own sauces and oils, chipotle ketchup? yes please.
Jesus asking the cup to be taken away did not want to escape death. The cup was the shame and ignominy of arrest as a law-breaker, a public trial and conviction, and subsequent crucifixion as a malefactor. As any normal man would do, Jesus was not sure that he could stand this or would be able to fulfil the request His Father had made. He not doubted the Father but himself. He did not want to fail in order to be missing the ability to save so many lives. Jesus was exceeding fearful of himself, fearful lest he should make a misstep and thus spoil the entire Gods Plan" href="http://christadelphians.multiply.com/tag/plan%20van%20god" target="_blank">plan of God which he had so obediently undertaken and thus far so loyally performed. Though God’s measure is not our measure Jesus did not mind to live according God’s measures and to die as a blasphemer or murderer.
2 tsp olive oil
Le Marmite Bazar
eventually. When did you last
Garden paths are not walking paths for kids; they are mazes, designed for getting lost. Quickly. Let them. The funny thing about kids is that eventually, they get hungry. Or thirsty. They’ll find you.
Shifting into Purer Consciousness ~ Integrating Spiritual Transformation with the Human Experience shares how to integrate the accelerated energies that come with spiritual transformation, make your ascension process easier, and anchor your light body as you help the earth, yourself, and others spiritually evolve.
There will be some great forwards available when they pick 5th. Russian center Alex Galchenyuk will most likely be available to pick. After a season where he recorded 83 points in 68 games with in the OHL with the Sarnia Sting, he missed all but two regular season games this year due to a freak injury to his knee. Drafted #1 in the 2010 OHL Priority Selection Draft, he has great hands and projects as a Bobby Ryan or Marian Hossa type forward. If he is still up when Toronto has their pick, look for them to snap him up.
Hello, I think we need both genders – danglers and built-in coin purses – BOTH. A world without either is a very unfunny thing.
I took that night for what it was. A second chance. A lesson who not to be, what not to become.
This my friends is what pure joy looks like.
Speaking of the Catalyst, he narrowed this view of the cycle to creators and created, organics versus synthetics. “Without us to stop it, synthetics would destroy all organics.” While this appears to only be the case with the geth and quarians, after the quarians are defeated by the geth, the rest of the galaxy would recognize the geth as a huge threat, and every other race would join in this war.
Going through a separation I experienced a myriad of emotions. At first I felt this incredible weight lifted from my shoulders. I felt renewed strength. I breathed in air that was filled with hope for a better future for my children and myself. People are always surprised when I say this because it seems like I didn't really care about my marriage. The reality is the farthest thing from that statement. What most people don't realize is that I grieved the loss of my marriage as I watched my husband slowly turn into a stranger over the past 4 years. I grieved the loss of my marriage when I realized that improperly treated mental illness robs not only the sufferer but the rest of their family of any sense of security or peace. I grieved the loss of my marriage when I realized that I had to make a choice that put safety and security on one end and marriage on the other.
I'll focus on three of the stories not only because they're the best in the book but because they also illustrate where MacLeod really excells. First off the line is Miracle Mile a story about two childhood friends who have grown up to become professional distance runners. As the Giller Prize judges noted 'MacLeod brings into vivid concrete language the physical experiences that mark us as profoundly as any thought.' By writing about two 'track people' he is able to mark the ways in which their bodies are different to those of most ordinary people, 'designed to do only one thing....We all had our special skills, our fascinating powers and we just barnstormed from city to city, performing them again and again in front of different people....Sometimes I thought it might be better to be able to eat fire, or swallow a sword...'
I’d mention every other day, no matter how short sighted I was or how two dimensional it seemed.
GDP 1.335T (2010 est)
* There are no restrictions on themes but stories must be set in Africa or have very evident African content.
squash (6 cups, peeled, seeded and diced, about 3 pounds)
The Nation Institute: A nonprofit media center was established to extend the reach of progressive ideas and strengthen the independent press. Our dynamic range of programs include a bestselling book publishing imprint, Nation Books; our award-winning Investigative Fund, which supports groundbreaking investigative journalism; the widely read and syndicated website TomDispatch; our internship program at The Nation magazine; and Journalism Fellowships that fund up to 20 high-profile reporters every year. Work produced by The Nation Institute has sparked Congressional hearings, new legislation, FBI investigations and the resignation of government officials, has changed the debate and has a regular impact on the most urgent social and political issues of our day.
Style is a capitalist invention. It’s a trademark. It’s very useful in the world of commerce to have a good trademark, but it wasn’t my first concern. I got restless…
Button Card: Stamps - Papertrey Ink: Button Boutique; Ink - Ranger Archival Sepia, Antique Linen Distress Ink; Die cuts - Tattered Florals by Tim Holtz; Pin - CTMH Pretty Pins; Fabric - Fig Tree Quilts; Ribbon - Tim Holtz idea-ology
It’s a just a hypothesis, but it’s a troubling one.
The answer is "yes". Sometimes I swirl the dark into the light, other times I pull it in. It depends on the area and what I'm blending. With hair I almost always pull in varying length strokes to give that sort of texture to the final piece. For faces, I nearly always swirl. For the rest, it's more of a combination of the two, following the line of the image from where I want the darkest part of the shadow to the lightest part. It's one of those things that takes practice to see how the final product is going to look.
Princess Mononoke -- Hayao Miyazaki
I must be crazy, I thought. How do I think I’m going to accomplish all this?
5. Sometimes, I get sick of being the blind ____________. It's so sickening at times. I hate it that certain people only see my blindness when they see me.
My godmother, born in 1908, was born on a tenant farm. In the Tidewater region of Maryland and Virginia, people lived off the land and the water. The lives of poor tenants were still heavily dependent on the wealthy landowners. Everyone traveled by horse and cart while paddle steamers and some tall ships still plied the river bringing goods from across the Chesapeake Bay. Baltimore might as well have been the Emerald City to her.
It’s about being well at Term, coming into spontaneous labour, and progressing well. That all happens at home. If you can do that you can give birth in the hospital without too much trouble, and no one can stop you.
A: I didn’t think I had a chance of hitting my target, let alone exceeding it. Now I don’t really know. As much as possible I will put money into the project and into other creatives – artists, layout people – who suffer from these problems as they contribute.
I do not forgive her my brother Stevie, who is a little angel in heaven. I do not forgive her the whole tedious litany of Midge, Bea, Ernest, Stevie, Ita, Mossie, Liam, Veronica, Kitty, Alice and the twins, Ivor and Jem. This is subtle, complex writing, a palimpsest of voices which is not just 'clever' as Jordison writes, but passionate yet controlled. Note the way that Enright incorporates the family consensus language into the individual voice of the narrator: the ironic quoting of the family's phrase for Stevie: 'a little angel in heaven', and this: 'Margaret, who we called Midge, until she died,' conjuring in a stroke the terrible time when the family stopped referring to Margaret as Midge and telling a whole story of how death altered the family's attitude to her and wiped an aspect of her personality. It is the tension between the irony of the narrator's voice and the scenarios she thus conjures which belie her avowed lack of forgiveness (for these were after all the mother's tragedies) and which give this passage real emotional power. And those repetitions: they are, after all, daring, and their rhythm adds to the emotional impact. (Another stunning irony: in criticising her family's 'litany' the narrator creates a litany of her own and subtly demonstrates her own implication in their psychology.)
I think the worst thing an aspiring writer can do is to give up. You can’t get there if you don’t try. Yes, the critiques are hard, yes rejection is hard, but if you want to achieve your dreams, you have to keep going. I have one more very important bit of advice, and that is, never stop trying to be better. You will never reach perfection, but if you keep practicing and keep learning, you will continue to grow as a writer.
So, what did you think? I feel energized that I was able to complete this challenge and it is gratifying to know that I did it by dipping into the lovely beads that I have been hoarding for far too long!
Books Read:
This seems rather strange as most of the people who follow permaculture and are interested in this sort of thing are people who are concerned with the state of the world and want a naturally sustainable, barter system to become prevalent so that we can halt the destruction. All of this is fantastic in theory but then they want to charge you hundreds of pounds to learn. Obviously if this is their livelihood then they have to charge something but it really isn't accessible to the people who would probably implement it the most out of sheer necessity, so they are cutting out a whole swathe of the population who would help save the world because they don't have enough money to live the consumer type lifestyle we are all caught up in.
About a year after the sinking, Karl (who later became a banker) and Miss Newsom were married in the Church of the Transfiguration. The couple had four children, including Karl H. Behr Jr. (who founded and was president of Converter's Ink Company in Linden, N.J., now a division of Beatrice Foods Company). Karl, Jr. lived until 2002, reaching the age of 88.
"Wah~wah~wah~wah...". (Benn pulling out. The air is fresh.)
Pancake and baking mixes
The space will take up the length of our whole dining room table (which we now use as a computer desk) so it's going to be huge.
Bluffing Strategy + Test
June: $25 from Pureprofile (online surveys)
echoing within gestures
It was another nose to the grindstone sort of days. There was laundry and dishes, checking on the plants and schooling. When I wasn't doing all of that, I was working on the last pieces that still needed remaking for the shop and I finished, I think all but one of them. Once all that was done, I thought about making something new, maybe a one off, but the thought of having to not only come up with something new to make, but also to photograph it and get it listed was quite frankly, exhausting. Then I remembered the reticule.
And it’s a joy to post Colin Syndercombe’s tugster debut here . . . MV Kovambo. It’s a dredge vessel that brings up — are you ready for this –
He will be remembered for many reasons, but also has one distinction among the men who have been president (besides the matter of quitting the job): He is the only person in U.S. history to have been elected both vice president and president twice: 1952, 1956, 1968 and 1972.
A lot of very worrying and scary stories were told about warranty and indemnity clauses and how some educational writers had been caught out with this. Even an alleged breach may mean you are liable to pay. It was recommended that this clause be removed from contracts. I also learnt it is possible to take out Professional Indemnity and Public Liability Insurance with the NUJ if you are a member.
Larger British book retailers already receive the most generous terms in the English-language world from publishers, including Hachette Livre. Of the “cake” represented by the recommended retail price of a general book, major retailers including Amazon already receive on average well over 50%. Despite these advantageous terms, Amazon seems each year to go from one publisher to another making increasing demands in order to achieve richer terms at the publishers' expense. (You may have read in the press a few weeks ago of Amazon’s penalties against Bloomsbury and its authors). If this continued, it would not be long before Amazon got virtually all of the revenue that is presently shared between author, publisher, retailer, printer and other parties. (Again, you may have read that in the USA Amazon has been demanding that it should take over the printing, initially of print-on-demand titles, dictating its own royalty terms to publishers and authors). Hachette Livre are politely but firmly saying that these encroachments need to stop now. Declining all additional terms demands is the approach that HL take with all major retailers, and it is particularly important in relation to Amazon.
Condolences to his family and friends.
I suppose I could post a crappy cell phone pic:
As the lively ordeal came to termination, my dear god-
I haven’t mastered many things in life, but I have indeed graduated from the school of perfect salad dressing (with honors). You might be thinking, “Wow she’s really arrogant” or “I have to try this dressing!” I’m hoping for the later.
5. The needle-in-the-haystack effect A major challenge for FSBOs is the needle-in-the-haystack nature of the Web. There are millions of websites including the hundreds of thousands of company and agent sites. Without search engine optimization, meta tags and a host of other branding strategies to achieve high Web placement, the probability of the Web buyer finding the FSBO’s single listing online is small.
The walls of little Carter's room aren't finished yet, but they will be the soft pink you see in the leaves and one long wall will be stripes of white, the pinks and the greens.
Here is one of my cards in the book. Say Hello to the Basic Grey Luscious. And I do love that felt flower created using a die from My Favorite Things. Of course, I used a trusted SRM Stickers sentiment as usual :)
Farmer’s Neighbor #3: Not if we have anything to do with it! There are more people than there are governments and corporate giants!
To mistake heaven for just one night to live
Finally the darkness took the city, albeit willingly. The pinholes in the sky where stars peeked in mimicked the lit windows where small faces peeked out. Saul breathed deep and thought “I love this town,” complete with the cheesy accent and uplifting tone. He grinned at himself wryly and looked upon the edge of the building cornice. “1898” was stamped into a russet brick there, and then he noticed the multitude of stampings within range of his vision. He counted three “& sons” and eleven different manufacturers, if he counted the non-stamped bricks as one. This building must have either been built or fixed on the cheap – he now noticed the subtle variance between the colors of the bricks. They ranged from nearly brown to nearly bright red; from squared and well-formed to lumpy, and differed at least an inch in size overall in the two dimensions he could see. He stared and searched for a pattern, but alas, this was perhaps true randomness to him. In truth, there was a pattern, but it was so complex and lost in time as to be cryptic beyond the comprehension of even an immortal’s tuned recognition. Still, Saul felt the pattern and this seemingly unimportant moment would haunt him for a long time.
Pics later when I steal them from my FIL.
05. The Girl In The Swing
I’d like to present a new regular feature called “Principles of Good Design”. For this first post and in reference to the new year, let’s talk about movement in design. Not design movements, such as De Stijl or Bauhaus. I’m talking about looking at a space and seeing the movement that occurs as an element in that space.
Question No. 2: Do you have business loans? And, if so, did you have to guarantee them personally? For most small businesses, a business loan will require personal guarantees. This means the owner’s personal assets could be at risk in the event of a business default. Business loans should be insured. Many bank loan agreements will have a clause allowing the bank to call the loan at any time. That risk is heightened when the guarantor is out of the business due to death or disability. Life and disability insurance can protect against that risk by assuring the creditor that outstanding loans can be paid in full in the event of a tragedy.
all these machines will rust I promise, but we'll still be electric
These giants of the scientific argument concerning the origins of modern humans almost got it right, and all have unfortunately had their heads raised on the pike of their theories’ obviously not working very well. Wallace, the discover of the process of Natural Selection (Darwin was the popularizer) as usual, stuck his head out the furthest and consequently his head has been raised the highest by the intellectual savages, except for the much earlier Lamarck.
We are responsible for our choices.
A leader must be able to communicate his or her vision in terms that cause followers to buy into it. He or she must communicate clearly and passionately, as passion is contagious.
2) “Start-Up” phase; Building lease, interior set-up, incorporate, additional
What happened to Juhi? Watch the movie if you dare to see, or ask me in the comments and I’ll tell you. Let this be a warning to you, don’t do drugs! Thank you for reading this post, but now, with all due respect, all I have to say is…
Rosemary's Baby
I have hated my enemies, and then they’ve passed out of my daily life, I’ve largely forgotten about them, and then maybe even caught myself wondering at some point, “Why did I hate that son of a bitch so much?” But the ember is still there, however faintly, patiently waiting for the little puff of wind that will bring it back to life.
Only one problem: It's all bullshit.
We never sat down to a meal that wasn't interrupted.
You know this type of communication: clauses get piled on top of one another, the speaker interrupting their own thoughts with digressions.
After 1 hour:
I had the joy of going to Walt Disney World during the International Flower and Garden Festival. There were beautiful and unique ways of growing and displaying flowers in a garden. I came back with many ideas and wonderful pictures.
Well, for one Thomas and Fredrik are the only ones to live in the same city so we meet up a couple of times every month on weekends to focus on YOTG, if any of us has anything specific with any other bands we have to rehearse without that person. It’s really not that hard because this is something we love to do as opposed to have to do. If we could we’d do this 24/7 anyway so it never feels like hard work – even though it can be a bit of a pain in the ass to get in the car sometimes to travel 160km one way! Once arrived it’s just great to play together though. So far, thankfully, no gigs with our respective bands have clashed, but I’m sure it’ll happen in the future. At worst some rehearsals has had to compete with another members other bands gig – which I’m sure happens for all other bands too that have members in several bands.
The Secretary of Energy with respect to all forms of energy;
Christian T-Shirt Company Faces Boycott & Investigation for Declining Service to Gay Pride Group
Faith during your lowest moments
Decisions decisions
The wooly sheep and baby jesus in the wooden cradle were Grandma's, the rest, Mom's, as she loved Christmas.
Our back yard is in dire need of top soil in many places, so my sweetie decided to get some…to the tune of twenty ton’s worth.
this part actually went pretty quickly.
Weigh oranges and add equal weight of sugar
Most of the above are on my agenda… I even saw some water butts today, measured them and found a good location for them. Instead of taking the next natural step in parting with cash we walked away and bought some seeds and now have a garden deck area littered with brightly coloured pots. Soon to be full of floating seeds. Now we patiently await the dry season…. Regarding that four letter word, Work, my job hunt continues… steadily and surely.
Today the Indian economy is in need of machineries and crude oil as it is on the verge of becoming a developed economy. With such a vast amount of resources, the country requires proper ways to gain global recognition which is made possible with the help of online business portals and import export trade leads.
This is an "accordion" card. The covers are thick card (scavenged from the cover of an old calendar) covered in patterned paper. The inner accordion part is 300gsm white card, 11" wide, folded at 2 3/4 " intervals (making 3 folds and 4 panels), then die-cut whilst folded so the sides remain intact for the joins, but the top and bottom has pretty edges to match the covers. The first and last panels are glued to the insides of the covers together with a length of lace to act as a closure.
Finding gratitude
The upcoming deer hunting seasons for the state have been set by the Arkansas Game and Fish Commission. The seasons were approved at today’s meeting of the Commission.
So Autism Awareness Month is over and what has it done? The Autism Community has been blogging fervently for thirty days, parents have been blogging about their experiences, and so have autistics some on their own blogs and some as guests of blogs like The Thinking Person’s Guide to Autism. So many words written by so many people, but have they made any difference? Have all those words changed anyone’s mind? Has anyone outside the Autism Community noticed all those words, did anyone hear them, did anyone listen?
Next, children's literature expert Leonard Marcus came before the audience and referred to people's memories of Ms. L'Engle as a gifted oral storyteller. Also, he shared an interesting fact: Ms. L'Engle won The Newbery Award at the same time Ezra Jack Keats won The Caldecott Medal for A Snowy Day. I'm looking forward to reading Mr. Marcus's book Listening for Madeleine, due to come out this fall.
Here are some pics...
Lots of great stuff on the back burner but I will get it out now when I do. Basically when I feel like it. I do not care about numbers and traffic any longer as well. I will continue to do the type of posting I have been doing and yet I am going to take it easy too. I need to study my Chinese more and I have some music and video projects I want to get into as well. And while the tone of this post may sound negative I just want to say that The Uranium Café will be bringing you lots of new goodies in the year to come. My next project is to catch up my A to Z list and then on to more posts on the obscure and yet wonderful films (and music and comic books) I have been pandering here for quite some time, and still with no goofy looking Amazon or Google Adsense crap at the bottom of the post. Never had that junk and never will. The Uranium Café is still a blog with a credo. And who needs comments when you have a code, right?
An easily read sign.
I am so excited to have you hopping with us!!!
OMGoodness!!!!! This book really spoke to my heart about becoming "a wife after God's own heart"!
This second stage is what they (the evil people) talk of as “unplugging” or “pooling” him or her, whoever the person is that is being maltreated.
Analgesic: Drinking mint & spearmint tea is beneficial in curing menstrual cramps and other muscular spasms. It also helps in easing intestinal pains, especially in small children and the elderly.
UMNO has lost its credibility
“The party is just a facade,” smirked my friend.
I’ve got something for you
He said: ‘In many cases it appears that conditions that wipe out species wipe out languages,’ said Gorenflo.
Nine different duty stations,
This is why he was here. Italy was a unique routine and place he could escape from the banal of his day-to-day life. However, over the years as Italy has adopted more and more of the comforts of America Mike’s habits have followed him. Now, even his phone worked in Europe and the cost was so low it made no sense to turn it off. Even vineyards have Wi-Fi so he had been awakened this morning before dawn by a Facebook birthday reminder for a “friend” he had never met and didn’t even like.
301 9. “Don Quixote and the Constitution.” Bradford P. Wilson and Ken Masugi, eds., The Supreme Court and American Constitutionalism (Lanham, Maryland: Rowman & Littlefield, 1998), pp. 93-105. (Source: Item D-IV/13/1996, below.) See Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, January 22, 1998, p. 8, January 29, 1998, p. 8.
as roll Royce Olympus engines going into a roar
paying off your credit cards is the best investment one can make. do you really want to pay $300 for the $100 printer you bought so long ago? or still be paying months down the line for the shoes you long ago banished to the back of your closet because not only can you not afford a nice night out but they also hurt your feet?
I know a few people thought this bloggin lark was gonna be a 'five minute wonder' for me (shame on you Dave W!), but I can honestly say I'm every bit as enthusiastic about it now as I was on this day last year. I've really enjoyed being able to get some of my old musings out, but the real bonus that I hadn't anticipated back then, has been meeting so many great new bloggin' buddies.
Sir Jeremy, the UK’s permanent representative to the UN between 1997 and 2003, was at the centre of UK-led efforts to negotiate a second UN resolution in early 2003, seen by many countries as necessary to authorise military action.
As those automatic doors glided shut for the final time, Michal suddenly appreciated the true depths of the old myth. The splendid garden still nodding in the sunshine, peeping for the last time around a final corner, whilst the angel fended off the excruciatingly naked humans with his flaming sword.
It surprised me, to be honest. I was hoping for a good crowd for us, but this far exceeded my hopes.
This is a color I have never worn, but I thought it would look good with my purple hair. The first thing I noticed when I opened it and gave it a squeeze was how highly pigmented it was. I wore Etude Lip Concealer in both pictures, but honestly, I don't think it's needed.
“Oh you can’t be leaving us!” she wailed. “It’s really shocking that my relatives don’t know about you. I’m going to make sure my mother-in-law hears about what a great entertainer you are and everything you’ve done for the image of gorillas.”
When truth is revealed
"Although Chinese laws do exist to protect intellectual property (IP), the question is whether anyone is prepared to enforce them. IP protection will need to be adequately addressed before Western software developers are prepared to dive aggressively into the Chinese market."
a. Internal Communications
‘Working-class, often Latino, parents would be denied child tax credit refunds if they lack Social Security cards proving they are authorized to work in the U.S’.
I'm going to finish this episode of Mad Men then go to bed. Sleep is so amazing.
Oh, wait. I’m sorry. That was me assuming that Democrats and the mainstream media had enough brains or enough fairness to treat both sides the same way. When they don’t have any of either.
. . . calling you to follow and obey Him?
‘You can’t just defend everything by just saying, “oh, it’s the playoffs.” That’s a mindset I don’t buy into or understand,’ said Vancouver Canucks captain Henrik Sedin, whose brother Daniel is out with a concussion courtesy of yet another elbow. ‘How do I put this? In the playoffs, if you do something and you get punished, you are really going to hurt your team. In the regular season, if you do something and you get punished, the way players are punished, I don’t really think it’s going to hurt your team. I think if you show no respect for your opponents, then at least you’re going to have a lot of respect for your teammates, and you don’t want to hurt them.’
In a medium saucepan, spray oil and sauté garlic. Add chipotle chiles, chili powder, cumin, chicken broth, tomato sauce, salt and pepper. Bring to a boil. Reduce the heat to low and simmer for 5-10 minutes. Set aside until ready to use.
Designer - Lee Murphy
CE: Where do these shows fall on the calendar?
Salt and pepper- to taste
Mom had moved in with him 5 years ago when Dad died. Despite his Irish name, he was a Native American through and through. His mother was a full-blooded Navaho and he was very proud of that lineage. His grandfather had called him “Little Pigeon” because he had enjoyed walking the ledges untethered since he was a kid.
“It stands to reason. God, or possibly one of the saints, maybe; if He’s too busy.”
Well, thanks for letting the deceased know. He would be sure to be careful next time!
The West Bay Corridor project that is now under way by the FORCayman Alliance is one such project aimed at boosting Cayman’s economy. Here it is anticipated that a brand new West Bay community area will be developed, creating economic stimulus and job creation, both badly needed in Cayman right now.
The goose, where's that fowl? We will eat till we burst!'
How do children become bullies?
- I'm starting to wonder if all of my Disney blog planning is a great idea for my psyche. I normally can get a solid 8 months of satiation from a visit, and this most recent one in October was a particularly long visit, so I was hoping the hankering would hold off for a year... Sadly no. I'm in full-on Disney-Reverie. I feel bad for the Tofu Muchacha... We're not planning to go until January of 2014. I'm not sure I'll be able to take it.
I’m extremely proud to have finished. I’m excited I made under 3 hours. I’m a little bummed that I didn’t make the 2:45 time I thought I could make. I was well on track for it until wretched mile nine. But that little bit of disappointment doesn’t diminish what I did today. I ran a mini marathon, and I have the medal around my neck to prove it. I’m sore, tired, and burned off approximately 1460 calories today.
Deadline for submission is May 6, 2012.
Just the fact I'm awful at blogging.
How do you do?
Enter the details of your organisation
The frost is on the pumpkins
Guess how much water it collected.
Samuels spent four years in the Air Force in the 1950s and credits the military with building his self confidence as a young black man from Philadelphia. He believes there’s a need for a forum focused specifically on black veterans.
We do office celebrations for birthdays, and each year I duck out on my own and ask that we not do much, that I don't enjoy being the center of attention, etc. And they, begrudgingly, agree. And so yesterday, I got a very nice card with lots of sweet messages in it, and some happy birthdays and it was blissfully a non-event.
Lips: Sobe Botanicals Lipgloss - Neglige
“I was so worried. I knew I was due to meet you here today but, when I saw you in that other city so very far away, I was worried that you would not reach here in time for our appointment.
I'm sure soon there will be the tiny feet of kittens running around the house, because remembering your summer as 'The summer vacation my cat died' is just awful. And seriously? Our house with just one cat?
CHRISTINI AB, SHUTT KA, BYERS KE. Influenza vaccination rates and motivators among healthcare workers groups. Infect Control Hosp Epidemiol 2007; 28: 171-177.
Four years ago yesterday, Deborah Jeane Palfrey was found hanged in a shed behind her mother’s home in Tarpon Springs, Florida, the victim of government persecution that literally drove her to her grave. I’ve been asked if I knew her, and I regret to say that I did not because I’ve been told by those who did that she was a kind, sweet, wonderful person whose philosophy of running an escort service was the same as mine: treat one’s girls fairly and honestly, as one would like to be treated oneself, and extend the same courtesy to one’s clients. Indeed, her only important ethical breach is the one forced upon all whores by criminalization: in order to protect ourselves, our associates and our property we must deny what we are, and officially cloak our legitimate and socially-vital profession under ridiculous disclaimers about “time and companionship”; escort services (including mine) must even require subcontractors to sign documents stating that they agree not to have sex with clients, even though we’d have to let them go if clients repeatedly complained that they obeyed such contracts. As I discovered in my own (insignificant in comparison to Deborah’s) experience with the injustice system, we are forced to commit felonies such as fraud and perjury in order to escape tyrannical persecution for running a business that is neither wrongful nor fraudulent.
12-12-2007
The divorce will be final on February 7th and I will be going back to my maiden name. 2011 was a year for changes but I see a bright future for 2012.
And beige.
making has made some people feel like they have a little additional license to be loose with the language.
And with no Major Championship berths on the line, most national championships were a cut below what we’ve become accustomed to. Leaving us with a lot of “good” meets but not many great meets.
A few years ago, we purchased a new car for towing. We don't use a windshield cover nor do we use a shield. The only protection for our towed car are the large mud flaps behind our motorhome's rear tires and a solid, heavy mud flap the width of the rear bumper that almost touches the ground.
There were several instances of disaffected BNP members calling on other far-right nationalists to join the B-F-P, promising that it would not be another version of UKIP.
I certainly think so!
Blue Moon was released in February 2012 and is comprised of nine tracks. Each of the pieces showcase Jamal’s creative reinvention of swing, provide a pretext for breathtaking melodies and showcase his unique relationship with his new working group. The recording “does a brilliant job of drawing together the various strands and styles he does so well” and is “from top to bottom…one very strong album” (Seattle Post-Intelligencer).
Here's the back of the last card, with a message expressing sadness that the family had moved to Oregon. Bertha talks about Herman and Minnie, Eva's son and daughter-in-law:
So I stop and think about the idea of meaning. Two people can see different meanings in something and people can try to persuade others which meaning to believe. Not all attempts to persuade others works. In The Hunger Games, those in power attempted to convince the tributes that their being chosen was an honor. They have little to no success at that. I haven't read the next books yet, but I suspect that the effort to convince people that Katniss' actions in The Hunger Games were about love and not rebellion will fail too.
On the up side, the people are lovely and it's mostly a laid back rotation. Not to mention that I am learning a ton. You know, when my head isn't spinning.
I love how he now expresses sudden concerns for all of these mentioned territories. Maybe if they got more media attention and pressure by activists then these will change. You know, like the activists who are in Palestinian villages getting beaten, arrested and sent to prison without trial. Maybe we should make these other issues mainstream if we can. Also, yet again you didn’t deny Israel was an occupying force itself. All that is left, after your moral collapse, is to point fingers. Meanwhile you can talk about the close friendship Israel had with Apartheid South Africa too, that was a concerning historical friendship.
Preparation of the Sauce
I for one enjoyed watching folks, as I could tell many were from around the world. Even if not everyone knew the great historical significance to every detail, I could conjure that they understood the power behind it all.
Some things that I could have been experiencing this week were some swelling in my hands and feet, which has not happened yet! Some additional hair growth in strange places, which I will plead the fifth on :-) and backaches, which I occasionally feel at night depending on how I am laying. I have a while to go yet, so I'm certain some changes are well on the way. Oh! One thing that I did this week was finally purchase a belly band! It's an elastic tube top looking thing that would come in handy even for those who are not pregnant but suffer from muffin top or for those who wear low rise jeans... a bit too low. I don't need the belly band often but on occasion I wear a pair of pants that I cannot button so this little stretchy thing comes in handy! Not to mention, it was kind of fun purchasing something meant for maternity.
“Tanner. Tanner Talcott.”
“simultaneously terrifying and intriguing”
So, for February, March, and April I ran a total of 574.25 kms = WOW!
Btw, this past week, Mak isah been cooking my everyday normal simple recipes for 'berbuka puasa' or 'Sahur'. Too much food on the table is also a waste isn't it?
Elijah Davis is not listed on any of the top recruiting sites, but after today he probably should. Davis poured in a team-high 25 points in 27 minutes off the bench, while also grabbing 11 rebounds. Davis was the difference for the Celtics, as he was one of just two players to score in double digits.
Decisions, then. Who to applaud? It seems so unfair to single anyone out that I believe I must settle for eating a whole lot of plant food and allowing the chemicals to decide. I really am looking forward to this. I hope to see you there, though I'd much rather you didn't see me.
The lamb was sure to go
There was much discussion about the role of a University/State/Community Colleges in trying to save rural communities…how is this done…how build partnerships and trust…how to provide incentives to faculty working in creative/innovative ways in a structured academic setting when it comes to promotion and tenure…and even if the University changed its incentives, how does that bode if a faculty member moved on to another University? How are incentives provided to teams and excellent team work? We are standing at the crossroads…maybe an intersection right now in academia which can shape the future of creatively rewarding innovative work while still maintaining needed structure in the promotion/tenure process. I remain positive that we’ll find a way to work through this!
How many times we came that close feeling like one,how many times we were willing to unify our lives when imponderable factors were always putting obstacles in our way.
In addition to the more hefty fare of X and Face to Face, Australian cinema will also bring its lighter side to Raindance with the farcical comedy-drama, The Wedding Party. A marriage of convenience is thrown into chaos by the groom’s deeply dysfunctional family in this feature debut by writer-director Amanda Jane. Ahead of an Australian theatrical release in 2012, The Wedding Party will have its European premiere at Raindance on October 8.
Scientists from Woods Hole, as well as Stony Brook University in New York state and Tokyo University, measured a dozen different isotopes on and below the ocean surface, and collected plankton and fish for analysis.
The Official SCOAN
He needs to look at some law, and so do we:
"We, sometimes, (as writers) all just bumble around."
ERA Leader Starting: Larry Jackson 3.14
As always, let me know if you have any questions or would like some specific information about any aspect in particular.
(3) If the parents are determined to be Muslims.
Just down from the Spylaw Tavern I managed to find the entrance to Spylaw Park which led down to a footbridge over the river to join the Water of Leith Walkway. I'd walked the section from Balerno to Currie a couple of weeks ago (see here), but this section called the Dells was really stunning with a full-scale green canopy, numerous criss-crossing paths, quite a few weirs in full flow, and some impressive & secluded riversides houses - it really is a great piece of nature in the midst of a large city.
It went together really easily, this despite the fact my sewing machine was having the mother of all mardy fits and kept snapping the thread, looping stitches, having tension traumas etc etc…I changed the needle, changed it for a smaller one, changed the upper tension, the lower tension, swore, cursed, took the pins out before sewing over them……I got there in the end but it needs looking at, I think…..a service is long overdue!
Moral is be grateful because once its gone you will be devastated, be appreciative today and watch your life change. try it for 30 days minimum, my challenge to you. PEACE
Edmund Burke defined a nation which involves a shared identity, history and ancestry, and continuity: “… it becomes a partnership not only between those who are living and those who are dead, but between those who are living and those who are dead, and those who are to be born.” A racial world view is a traditional world view and goes back to Anglo-Saxon-Celtic tribal days.
K I could not find a pic of the great Spader licking the injury site but here is a pic of the legs that so attracted him, being marred, scarred and broken from an accident (accidents play a central role in this movie)..
This 400 calorie dinner was invented as a way of using up leftover ham from Christmas. Since it contains eggs, it is equally good as a 400 calorie breakfast as well. This recipe includes one of my favorite healthy food finds: Cabot 75% reduced fat cheddar. Unlike fat-free cheese, it melts wonderfully. Using it allows you to still enjoy melty-cheesy goodness without all that extra fat. Plus it tastes great!
Yoshihiro Kawaoka of the University of Wisconsin-Madison, who led the research being reported Wednesday, said last month that the changes to his paper "were mainly a more in-depth explanation of the significance of the findings to public health and a description of the laboratory biosafety and biosecurity."
The point of my story is I can't always post photos of all the things happening in the shop. For example this weekend we had some AMAZING CLASSES! They were packed and full of fun! Everyone loved the Jack & Cat classes~ they received rave reviews.
Unfortunately there really isn't much to report on at the moment. Working part time 30 hours a week and studying at uni full time = not much sewing if any at all and not much inspiration, not a lot of blogging, no agility, and no cooking...I really need to find a better balance I think! I do have nearly two months off in June and July, after exams finish so I know what I will be doing... Lots of sewing, blogging, cupcake making, agility and relaxing I think!
Up to this point Saul had been spiritually blind but he did not know it. Likewise, there are millions of people around us who are also spiritually blind but they, too, do no know it. Saul found that out when Christ revealed Himself to him. Likewise men and women today will know the truth of the gospel only when Jesus Christ is revealed to them. It is done with the preaching of the Word of God.
Starring: Elizabeth Olsen, Adam Trese, Eric Sheffer Stevens
Architect: Bruce Goff
We have gotten a bit blase about the use of historic strains of yeast, but it's worth noting that the breweries aren't always cool with it. When I visited Rodenbach last year, master brewer Rudi Ghequire expressed vehement disapproval about how Rodenbach's yeast had been reappropriated by American yeast companies. His complaint is not entirely misplaced.
Cashew nut chopped: 2 tbsp
10-07 Lisbon, Portugal - Pavilhao Atlantico
We wouldn't want you putting GDT after every challenge entry only to be disappointed now would we??
I came across this lovely and simple home in the Netherlands and wanted to share. The family living in this house decorated it using a lot of white despite having the children – after all, there’s a washing machine :)
The reason why I don’t manage to update my blog on a daily basis is the fact that I don’t have a computer at the moment. For me who might be categorized as a computer addict it’s rather strange to go without.
You can paste the figures back onto
The media is littered with Malema’s contemptuous dismissals of those who are not in his camp, from political opponents to journalists, and extending to colleagues in the ANC who don’t share his views. His aggressive and angry outbursts suggest a poor capacity to regulate his rage at those who anger him, which is often a hallmark of somebody who is easily narcissistically wounded.
How d'ya like them alliteration?
Any lorry driver I see not wearing a shirt.
With as many as ten players leaving in the summer we need some quality signings. I can’t see more than four or five new arrivals in the summer as we need to trim the squad size. Fuller sadly seems to be leaving and moves are afoot to try and get Huth to extend his contract as he only has a year left on his current contract. Danny Higginbotham is back from his loan at Notts Forest and with a year left on his contract could move on in the summer as well.
Fucking hell I hate guild leaders.
Me: I love speaking to you, I just hate the phone. Was there something in particular you wanted to tell me about yesterday?
Well, technically four words and 1 slang....I used the needles the pattern suggested, honest...and I knit very loosely...so I can only guess that the yarn was too fine for the pattern specs...still...fun! I shall have to try again, and it only took mere minutes to make.
And so, my ongoing - and frankly ridiculous - brush with fame.
Hmmf.
Comment #485 - Deb Dorrington (confirmed)
We had an option of joining the normal membership. Or the "upgraded" membership which means we get ONE towel per visit. One towel?? What is this? I had a roommate that used to steal the towels from NYSC to clean our apartment! Equinox was a towel party (a eucalyptus smelling towel party I might add). I didn't realize thin, rough towels were such a commodity here. We opted to not pay the extra 200 euros a year for a towel.
I took a step back.
crowd and towards me. He was about to prepare himself for
Shalom and Chag Pesach Sameach! Spending Passover in Israel has been an interesting and introspective experience for me. My family is here visiting me, and I’ve taken a week off to spend time with them and reflect on my past 7 months in Israel. Click “read more” to see a little something I wrote for the BINA Passover newsletter…
As a mother that is very attached to her child, I find myself wanting to babywear more and more each day. I have spent the last few months trying to decide whether I’m best suited to a ring sling or a mei tai, but this is a whole new world to me and I still have no idea?
And speaking of charisma, holy 80s Bruce Willis! For as epic and explodey as this gets, it effectively milks a really simple premise of one man against a handful of others. Many action films undercut their own impact by having a lot of characters, locations, and plot details, but less is definitely more here. Willis is at his peak, conveying not only gruff charm but the rare notion that the physical hell he goes through actually takes a toll on him (most action heroes perpetually seem like they've done nothing more than lift a gallon of milk). I was a bit underwhelmed by Hans Gruber, to be honest (maybe the notion of a sophisticated villain just isn't as novel to me?) but that might be partially because instead of experiencing the memorable debut of a new talent as 80s audiences did, it was more "why yes, that is noted thespian Alan Rickman."
The first items we grab once we get inside are Baguette, Raisin Bread (loaf) and Flour Tortilla. We would get the Egg Rolls but that’s never available at closing, not even ’till the afternoon. Those are really good! The rest of the products, we just grab what catches our interest. One bread for the trip home!
However, they just do not have enough local support to mount their campaign in Heanor, and thus have launched a national day of action, bussing in people from across the country. These people know absolutely nothing about Heanor except that they object to Heanor residents' decision to elect two British National Party councillors four years ago.
I chose the bad side of the wood in case I left the finish woodsy. The other side was like brand new and we can't have that! :)
After the game, Iker told Telemadrid, “the first thing I have to do is thank the fans for their support. There’s no need to think anymore about this, penalties are what they are, they’re a lottery and so there’s no need to reflect any more. We played well, we had a lot of hope, the team played good football, but Bayern is a good team, and we have to congratulate them.” I’m so glad we have a captain that knows what to say after a defeat! And our second captain also praised Bayern, saying they are a “equipazo.” I also loved what he said about whether he’d take a penalty again: “if tomorrow I’m chosen to kick it again, I’ll do it, because when you’re feeling confident you want to help the team. It’s a lot of pressure but I’ve always known how to handle it.” Meanwhile, third captain Marcelo commented that “we’re a team and if someone fails, then everyone fails, and if one wins, then everyone wins… we’re warriors who gave everything we had to win… we didn’t achieve the victory but we were left with the feeling that we’re a great team. Penalties are a lottery. If you don’t have luck, it won’t go in. Those who shot them have to hold their heads up high.”
‘Follow me,’ the man says almost lazily, bringing me back to the present. ‘And wipe your tears. It is drawing too much attention from the crowd.’
thanks for reading, Robert
The stamp set is called, "Fright Night" and I made liberal use of various Hallowe'en themed punches (bats, spiders, tree, more bats, drippy goo). I really enjoyed making this layout and I simply ADORE the photos of Kerowyn. I love how the one on the left it looks like she's going "ewwww" to the slime strip across the top of the photo!
But I did come across a couple of interesting things. Namely, other bloggers who have used that word in relation to themselves.
I am conscious that in all this, I am responding to Slocum as a character in a way I don’t often do. The immersive quality of his voice – monotonous, hypnotic – encourages this. And it may be too that this is a book which requires some degree of identification with the narrator (I said some) for the best effect to be achieved. Slocum, warrior misanthrope, may be the perfect travelling companion for the reader who in one sense views life as something to get to the end of before anything bad happens. (He observes, not with regret but with relief, that “soon after my children die, no one will ever think of me”.) So, enough of Slocum as a person; what of him as a creation, and of his creator? Spending eleven years on a fat, pessimistic epic of domestic blitz surely makes Heller just as nuts as his character. (That’s a joke. Slocum looks stark staring sane, despite a few homeopathic hints late in the narrative that he may be losing his mind.) Mostly, when a novelist takes a decade or more between books, it’s time spent away from writing; but here, it’s easy to believe that Heller really did toil on this book throughout the 1960s and early 1970s. And we are the richer for him never having thought – or never having succumbed to the thought – “What I’m doing is mad!”
Nice thing about working at the hardware store is that I have no emotional investment in the enterprise. As my old dad once said, when they lose their power to fire you, work is kind of fun.
But these are quibbles. It's a spectacular film and a triumph for the animators at Laika who spent four years lovingly creating every detail. It will linger in the mind a long time, so be careful what child you take to see it. Not for those under ten and/or of a nervous disposition.
For those guys who are I-M-Tired-of-Angry-Birds, Bored-of-Angry-Birds, Nothing-Interesting-In-Angry-Birds. I can tell you one thing. ON YOUR FACE. By far this is one hell of a mobile game they put your index finger to work on.
What is a Ramekin?
A recent LinkedIn survey of 7,000 of their members found that 84% believe in career luck. Both Napoleon Bonaparte and former U.S. president Dwight D. Eisenhower were quoted as saying they preferred a lucky general to a smart one. I mean, why is it that some people always manage to be in the right place at the right time?
And the number one spot goes to Emma Wiggins from An Unexpected Bride
We started to get closer to the desert areas, although they were quite green as there has been more rain than usual this year. We passed many ruins of old settlements that were started in the 1870's when settlers came from Europe, especially Germany, to this area. They were encouraged to grow grain crops by the government as previous scouts had said the land was suitable for crops. However, the scouts had been there during a wet year, which doesn't happen very often. After crops failed year after year the settlements were deserted. These are the Kanyaka ruins.
*Loved the bit where the hooker that Pete adjourns with goes through all kinds of roles to find what Pete wants her to play. He just tosses out two casual, “Nopes,” before finally settling on being treated like the king he thinks he is.
And I miss her.
Mostly I’m just outlining it now, and taking a lot of notes. Inspiration is coming from a lot of different places, some new, some old. The Magician’s Nephew is a big part of it, as is The Last Battle. (It’s not a coincidence that those books tell the story, respectively, of the beginning of Narnia and the end of Narnia.) I’m rereading The Tempest and The Phantom Tollbooth and P.G. Wodehouse and the great Bond novel Casino Royale. I’m also rereading The Lord of the Rings, which oddly enough I’ve never really thought of as an influence before.
-making a template for your piped design
In any case, there has been a lot of just livin' life going on here. So here is an update on us. For the 3 people who still read this blog. ;)
December 27, 2011 Tuesday
MAC LipGlass Elle (may be discontinued) Pearlescent white/pink/peach with gold flecks (lovely!)
Smoothies of every type and flavor , every consistency and every volume…..this lady has a plan. And here is this plan.
Once she heals, she will be released back in the garden, but the vet bill is still there.
I received an email from Daniel Kraus, concerning this upcoming panel of speakers at the 2012 Booklist Youth Forum I will be a part of to kick off the American Library Association's Annual Conference in June.
Go and see for yourself.
The husband of a woman who was killed when her plane smashed into the World Trade Centre on 9/11 visited Guantanamo Bay to try and save the lives of the men suspected of being behind the attack.
When we depend on the media to shape our world view, we’re going to get a world view that looks a whole lot like the view from a harried, ratings-obsessed assignment desk: If it bleeds, it leads. If it’s sad, we’re glad! If it’s an abduction, ramp up production!
The common ground isn't just limited to the visuals. Perhaps one of the two most recognizable features in Batman character is his hard to constrain fury that he keeps locked inside. There were many moments when Batman was close to snapping, and times where he needed someone to stop him. If he didn't his unmatched fury could go extremely far.
6. Lila (Season 2)
Oh, I can't seem to think of a poem to go with the image, so please feel free to create one yourself in the comments!
(Qur’an 93:6-11)
We continued to add layers of paint, lightly and carefully. Then we laid it on its back, and checked all angles for coverage in all corners, and around all nailheads and hinges. This is where the small foam brush came in handy, it allowed us to really get in around the nailheads and trimwork for good solid coverage.
But what I really want to get at, is the act of a person wrapping himself or herself inside all these notions and preconceptions, in the first place. They do it as a source of security, they want to step out into the world firmly rooted in who they have preconceived themselves to be. They call it a strong sense of self, but this is not how a strong sense of self is truly gained; this is only how fake castles are built! They carry around their castles of sand and hold these castles in front of them, presenting them to the world, holding them up in front of their faces, but what happens when all that sand comes tumbling down?
wind, please blow me away
Wearing white for Eastertide.
But I cannot stop watching Arashi’s Face Down pv preview. It’s been said everywhere and I’m sure those of you who don’t like Arashi are rolling your eyes, but just…give me a break here, ok??
I feel in some way as though I owe them, that I owe donor families the world over.
Hayden’s was a brutal innings, comprising 11 sixes. Sitting in the crowd at long on, we were regularly given catching practice.
Image - Ashee - A&T Designs
Says Support for Atlantic Yards is "Unwavering"
I was minding my own business, really I was! Eating veggies and salads like a good girl and trying to stay away from those luscious chocolate chip cookies (sadly not succeeding much)! Along came Poorna of Presented by P flashing photos of her Bacon and Mushroom Risotto and being gleeful about how yummy it tasted. We had a long chat about risottos, cheeses, mushrooms and other edible treats. Of course the glutton in me reared her ugly head demanding a hearty risotto. Little shamefaced confession I gave in without much fight. Made a creamy, cheesy risotto for Friday night.
First, I tackled an old farmhouse writing desk. It was nasty. Dirty. Black. Spiderwebs. Ick. Here she is now:
Fourth, consider the sparkles. By this, I mean, go for glitter over shine. There is a lot of ill-advised satin in the store windows at this time of year. Believe me, I know. I walk through Georgetown every day. I know the retailers of America are trying to lure you with the siren song of a shiny satin tube dress, but resist! When you see those pictures where a flash has combined evil forces with the satin to add about 8 lbs to your frame, you will regret it.
More than once I have been told, “If you had been here twenty years ago it would have made a huge difference in my life and the lives of my family.” Not to defend myself I asked, “Would you have believed twenty years ago?” The answer was always the same; “No.”
I'm in a bad mood. Boo! Yes, that's me being angry. Cross me at your peril. With such indignation abrew, I thought it best to channel my sucky feelings productively, so I took to reading a more sprightly tome on the life of Diana Vreeland. Damn, that chick was positive. So upbeat was the former fashion colmunist and editor, her "Why Don't You?" column for Harper's Bazaar achieved cult success among the women of great means. Offering outside-the-box lifestyle thinking, the suggestions were both outlandish and seemingly achievable.
And thanks, as always, for listening!
-Kristin O’Brien, Cultural Map: Austin
Unfortunately, this question was answered far too soon...last night he was spat in one of his eyes by another spitting cobra, but that is an old, familiar trouble and very easy to fix. I am so pleased that we have been confined to base this month, in order to deal with all the dog/snake dramas round here!
The "wide tab" had a molded crease in it, which now that I think about it, might have been there to enable folding it down to access the oil filter. My utility knife said, "I'd just remove that thing entirely, and the molded crease makes for a really good blade guide".
You could be having a great week. And then, PAF, Sunday comes along and you feel like you just can't get anything done. And you feel like the city isn't moving at the right speed. And you feel like just coming home and doing nothing. And then you come home and feel guilty for doing nothing all day.
29 Alice in Wonderland – Lewis Carroll
For reasons unknown, our grade designated Kelley as “the slut.” No one had any evidence she had so much as kissed a boy. But she did have tiny breast buds forming and I suppose that was enough to condemn her. Kids would spread rumors about Kelley having sex with any boy who wanted it. They’d claim they saw her hop over the fence or swear their friend had totally done her.
The design paper is DCWV Mariposa. Cardstock Bazill. The card base is from CutCardstock, Metallic Stardream Crystal, a phenomenal cardstock that holds up to all the layers and embellishments. Metal corner, black pearls and flowers from WOC, Recollections and Prima. Gold mesh from the Funkie Junkie. I bought this when I saw Tosh's card featuring the Black mesh, which I also bought and will be using real soon- LOL. Blue Swarovski crystal from Jolees. The sentiment is from a Kraftin Kimme set. Although it is hard to see in the pic, I also used Blue iridescent Pebbles chalk for the clouds around her.
The Smoking Lily belt worked perfectly with the top, with its gold moths and the blue lines (gee, it's like they were made by the same company or something). I went with more gold with the big leafy earrings and the chunky chain.
In 2010, UK government-backed global warming alarmist group 10:10 produced an infomercial in which children who refused to lower their carbon emissions were slaughtered in an orgy of blood and guts. After a massive backlash, the organization was forced to remove the video from their website and issue an apology.
The junta leaders have said they are holding both Gomes and Yala.
the bloggers i nominate for the sunshine award are:
I know it’s only television. I know it isn’t real. I know that love doesn’t really work…but then again, it does, doesn’t it? Isn’t that why I watch the show? Isn’t it because love is that way, it is like Jim’s and Pam’s? Isn’t it because we know that is exactly how it is, even with Jesus? That is exactly how love becomes. Love grows in the soil of adversity. Love becomes in the midst of the near and the far. Love takes hold in the midst of absurdity and uncertainty. Love is two becoming one.
but instead I cry because they made me so blue,
Philippa
After a hard day’s box-ticking, form-filling, target-achieving and ethnic out-reaching, officers are advised to ‘Ensure your mattresses and pillows are comfortable and supportive…try to restrict fluids to prevent visits to the bathroom, although it has to be acknowledged that some people like to have a milky drink prior to bedtime to help soothe them.’
It’s now 24 hours later. I’ve got my ranting out of my system and I finally feel calmer. I still don’t have a decision and I’m still a bit bummed that this isn’t the golden opportunity I’d dreamed of, but I do now feel like I have most of the information. So, for the sake of sorting out my head and perhaps to help anyone else facing a similar situation, I’m going to go back to basics and list the pros and cons.
The 18th Annual Screen Actors Guild (SAG) Award nominations were announced today. The show will be simulcast live nationally on TNT and TBS on Sunday, January 29 at 8 p.m. (ET)/5 p.m. (PT) from the Los Angeles Shrine Exposition Center.
I have been a scrapbooker before I even knew that is what I was doing. I had always loved to put my pictures in albums with cute sayings or stickers and over the years my hobby developed into an actual craft.
Driveway remodel update: Thursday is DEMO day! I will take some before pics and pics of the demo to post. I am super excited about this project!!
For the pain to be set free…
I had wanted to post this yesterday, on Chap Goh Meh, or the 15th day of Chinese New Year to round up the last of my CNY themed posts, but work came up and I couldn’t finish the post in time.
In the same way, Jude and Peter use allusions to Jewish belief from the Pseudepigrapha to “speak their language” so to speak. It doesn’t mean the Pseudepigrapha was right, in fact the NT writers don’t condone its teaching. At the same time, their use of the Pseudepigrapha for illustrative purposes doesn’t diminish their point. They are not trying to prove that Angels slept with Humans, so we shouldn’t use this passage to do that either.
As I pulled away from Manhattan yesterday, I couldn’t help but pause to reflect on all that the city means to me. It truly is the most wonderful city in the world–granted I haven’t been to all the cities in the world. Therefore, I defer to the expertise of other New Yorkers and fans alike.
That these tortoises are the victims of a penal, or malignant, or perhaps a downright diabolical enchanter, seems in nothing more likely than in that strange infatuation of hopeless toil which so often possesses them. I have known them in their journeyings ram themselves heroically against rocks, and long abide there, nudging, wriggling, wedging, in order to displace them, and so hold on their inflexible path.
Spitzer now says his main goal in conducting the 2001 study was NOT to urge gay people to pursue reparative therapy, but to see if it actually worked on those who sought treatment. Spitzer says, “I actually had great difficulty finding participants.” This, of course, should come as no surprise. As some of you know from this blog, I myself personally responded to an ad Dr. Spitzer placed in 2001 eliciting testimonies from people who had been involved in ex-gay ministry when his study was conducted. I underwent a preliminary phone interview with one of Dr. Spitzer’s associates where it was determined that my background was exactly what they were looking for, for participation in the study. But then during my telephone interview with Dr. Spitzer, he disqualified me from participating in his study after learning that I did not believe reparative therapy worked. Dr. Spitzer explained he was “looking to speak with people who believe that gays can change.” If others who answered his ad were disqualified from participating on the same grounds, one need not be a rocket scientist to figure out how Dr. Spitzer published the conclusion he did.
Remember this post where I showed you my inspiration and the fabrics I purchased to get the room going? Well, here are photos of the 16" pillow cases I made:
James Hamilton-Paterson alternates the points of view to comic effect. Marta comes from the fictional Eastern bloc country of Voyde, recently liberated from Soviet control. She's a musician composing a score for a sleazy yet charismatic film director. Gerald is a ghostwriter/biographer preparing a book for a vacuous celebrity. Both just want a quiet place to work; their shady realtor assures each that the other will be no trouble. But Gerald is also loud off-key singer and cheerful drunk always getting into scrapes and Marta has noisy late-night visitors and puzzles Gerald no end. Gerald thinks Marta is a frump and a hag. She thinks he's a fool and a pain. They hate each other, yet they can't stay away from one another. Let the shenanigans begin.
I have to thank my friend Kortnie who helped me put them together; 4 hands were definitely better than 2 here since I had such a timeline to make. She helped put the cake rounds in, was my official taste tester and held the pops for me to make it pretty on top. You can also anchor them like I did in the containers I was serving them in which had those clear marble things in them to hold them upright. She also helped me make them pretty and deliver them. Thanks love!
Please, if you’re in the Kansas area, go see it.
The San Francisco Chronicle is posting voicemails from readers in podcast form. Check out this example from a caller who is angry about the way the paper describes drone aircraft. He wants to know why the “sub-editors” aren’t doing a better job.
I just sent a link of a recent article to a gentleman who was a tremendously helpful and gracious source. The article was two-fold—the longer piece was about a farmer who grows some niche crops; the source in question was the main focus of the longer piece’s sidebar. But all the same, this gentleman sent me literally hundreds of photos (and I basically forwarded them all to the editor and said, “Here you go! Pick your favorites!”) and he and the farmer gave up an entire afternoon to speak with me and show me the farming operation.
Another thing, when we go shopping I like to load the boot from the back right-hand corner first. It’s not OCD, it’s just logical – that way the stuff won’t fall over and roll around. It’s even better if you tie the handles together first. I swear Jenny takes pleasure in throwing the bags in randomly, so by the time we get home there’s tins rolling around the boot and the bread is always squashed.
Haiti – Two hurricanes, Gustav and Hanna, struck the Caribbean’s poorest nation in little over 4 days, just two weeks after tropical storm Fay had already drenched the country. the hurricanes left at least 200 people dead. The death toll could still climb substantially as thousands of people who escaped to rooftops to avoid rising floodwaters continue to starve. See: Hungry Haitian Flood Victims Stranded on Rooftops.
After extended play at the park, or perhaps right in the middle of it(this part of the story was not made clear to me) they decided to take a stroll through the cemetery adjacent to the park.
Stop back tomorrow for your chance to win a copy of Marie's book here on my blog. I'll let you know if I liked it. You may have already figured out the answer. ;-)
Several uncertainties remain, however. Captain Sanogo did not specify the timetable of this transition; while ECOWAS wants it to occur within a matter of days, the CNRDRE clearly wants to take its time in handing power back to civilians. Moreover, Sanogo’s declaration described the transition as occurring through a process of consulting with a broad spectrum of Mali’s political class (the famously undefined “forces vives” of the country), which would be at odds with the constitution he has supposedly put back in place. Most crucially, Sanogo has not addressed the question of who will preside over any transition. It seems likely that he is just playing for time, hoping to forestall potentially crushing international sanctions while continuing to run the show in Bamako for as long as possible.
Mom’s Breakfast Club was started to help educate moms and families about kids’ cereal and share the scoop on their nutritional benefits and ingredients. To learn more about the program, visit http://www.loveyourcereal.com/.
All the trees featured so far have been Japanese larch , Larix kaempferi. But this old bonsai is our only example of European larch, Larix decidua, and was once in the well-known bonsai collection of Paolo Riboli in Italy, until we purchased it some years ago. It is back at the nursery having been made available for sale by its current owner. Larch are our most popular and saleable species being as it is very tough and amenable to all bonsai techniques making it a very good subject for beginners. A conifer with all the benefits of any deciduous species, great golden autumn colour as well as a beautiful emerald-green foliage as it emerges in the spring, a must for all bonsai collections !
Taps open at noon and close at 7 pm.
“Listen to yourself Kev,” Grace replied. “He hasn’t expressly declared himself to be doing any of those things. You’re being paranoid. He could just be a little old man who lost his way on a day trip to the countryside and needs our assistance to re-surface, or a war veteran shell-shocked from many a valiant battle against his hobbit enemies, or lots of small children standing on each others’ shoulders beneath an over-large duffel coat.”
What passes now for human speech
Loons....
LA: We’re playing Shetland in a few days and I was lucky enough to go up and play in Shetland at the folk festival last year with another band and I had such a good time. I didn’t expect to have as good a time as I did! I made sure I stuffed a copy of our first record into one of the organisers pockets as I was leaving and said keep us in mind for next year and he came along and saw us at a Celtic Connections show at ABC in Glasgow and was in touch within a few days after to say I’d love to have you up I’m glad that’s worked out. So we’re doing a one-off show as part of the folk festival up in Shetland. Shetland is a mental place to go. It’s completely bizarre how much those fine people up there can drink and it’s good fun trying to keep up with them though not always a successful task! That one sticks out, that’s going to be good!
That's it. Otherwise, just follow the directions here to send your book. Don't fuss over the query; fuss over the first page. I look forward to seeing your books!
Which segues me into my next point. This is writing at a very sophisticated level. Fundamentally it reads effortlessly, the descriptions are evocative with a creative twist, and both the story line and pace flow along quite nicely. However what really stands out, without being obvious, is the control that makes it a clever story—as apposed to being clichéic; which, with this sort of a scenario could have been. Rather, the characters are complex because of their simplicity, as is the story line, and a happy ending seems only right to cap it off.
Once back on the move, the War Memorial at Putney Vale Cemetery & Crematorium is glimpsed through the trees. In the burial ground are the graves of many notable people including sculptor Jacob Epstein (the creator of the controversial Night and Day figures on Charles Holden‘s 55 Broadway) and Howard Carter, Egyptologist and excavator of the tomb of Tutankhamen, while the list of those cremated here includes footballer Bobby Moore, cricketer Len Hutton and numerous Thespians such as Kenneth More, Donald Pleasance and Jon Pertwee.
It was a good day. A very good day.
TOUCH
For me a tedious read.
So, once again let me tell you:
My lack of skills, are in part due to time constraints as a full-time student who works part-time, down time is rare. In fact, one day at my internship we were talking about what we would do if we had an entire day to do anything we wanted with an unlimited amount of money in the state ofColorado. I thought for a moment and literally the first thing that popped into my head was crafting. So I said out loud “I would go to all sorts of crafting conventions and classes for crocheting, beading, and painting”. Everyone was kind of surprised. I guess it’s the kind of response that evokes the “seriously, that’s what you would do?” face… but still even now, I don’t know of a different way to answer it with something that would be meaningful to me. Now, if we were allowed to leave the state, and had a time machine, that would be a different story…
This will keep you up to snuff on everything.
However, my brief response is: now you must change your paradigm, literary scholars and critcs and readers, and be on the lookout for the Great Global Novel (GGN). At least that’s what the optimist in me hopes for. Please don’t let this world dissipate into a dystopian Fahrenheit 451…
Morris: The great impact on your professional development? How so?
When we did get to bring him home, he was instantly a part of our family. He’d watch TV with us on the couch and his bed was right next to ours. Staff has always loved to run and he’s always loved big boy rides. The first summer after law school, we only had one car. Mrs. Z would come pick me up from work each afternoon and Staff would always be in the car with her. His head out the window, ears flapping in the wind. And when they'd turn the corner to where I was standing, I swear that dog would smile at me!
It's been broken into 2 parts in case you need to take a break.
2 ballet
Ms. Judd, paws up to you, for talking back to patriarchy rather than being shamed or silenced by it. You recognized a teachable moment and used the power of your celebrity to make the most of it. Vaginally Endowed Americans and fair-minded individuals everywhere salute you for your honesty and your astuteness. You are our VEA Solider of the Week. Peace out.
But on closer inspection, at its core, the film is a story of everyday transcendence - of the triumph of will against circumstance and time, of passion and tireless pursuit of perfection; a balanced look at the man behind the legend - Jiro not only as sushi master, but as father, son, and mortal. The film also takes you on a thought provoking journey - with one amazingly accomplished man and how he and his sons conduct their lives with an eye towards his inevitable passing.
I then finished the clip or mags on a half size steel torso at 100m. Went 6/6 with the Garand, 17/17 with the M14, and 15/20 with the AR. I think I was sighting wrong with the ACOG. I was aiming between the shoulders and hitting head shots. Which makes sense for the trajectory/zero/distance. I should have aimed at the lower COM and expected shots in the breastbone/heart region. That's why I missed 5 with the AR. That's my story and I'm sticking too it.
It seems that the greatest challenge associated with blogging and other forms of "gloss" is not one of knowledge claims but of the accountability of authoritative institutions. For instance, various claims made by the IPCC and US government as related to disasters and climate change are widely known to be false and Steve McIntyre has thoroughly documented many instances of questionable scientific practices in the so-called hockey stick literature. In both cases the relevant institutions have so far decided that it is easier to ignore the gloss than to deal with its consequences. But anyone who is paying attention can see what is going on. There is no ivory billed woodpecker.
Still on the to do list was the food pantry: I love the sight of well organized pantry. Is it just me or is there something soothing knowing that the cereal is properly stored and won’t go stale? That the flour and sugar is well contained and not sitting in the bag it came in, leaking all over? That the cans of soup are gathered together separate from the PB & J? That you could, in the case of a pandemic, live off your pantry for weeks without leaving the house? OK, maybe when it comes my pantry I’m a tad OCD.
5) Pour into prepared loaf pans.
Charlie gave Doyle a run for his money in this little yogurt store, and they went all over. The other patrons were very tolerant, because I didn't keep as tight a reign on Charlie as I might normally. I thought he could benefit from freely roaming around with a friend who also is an experienced wheelchair user.
These five items all beg for a federal criminal inquiry.
Rule no 3:Lemon
10 Right-click on frame 2 of the only (so far) layer of the movie clip and select Insert Keyframe. Your movie clip’s timeline should now look like this:
It is a busy launch month for the team at the VWDC. Ken Hudson and Mark Kirkpatrick participated in Orion@5 at MaRS in Toronto, March 31st. The afternoon event celebrating the fifth anniversary of the Orion network, that broadband giant of which Loyalist College is a member, and it allowed the team to showcase their work in Second Life. Among the distinguished visitors was John Wilkinson, Ontario Minister of Research and Innovation. Thanks to Andre and Tamara at Orion for inviting us to demonstrate our virtual worlds at the event.
I wonder if, like me, you watched the audience in front of President Obama as he addressed Parliament the other day. All of them were staring up adoringly, as if watching a political colossus – rather than a shallow, idea-free politician who has used his Presidency unwisely…..and to little effect.
On Saturday 18 February, community members are invited to join Conor at the Lovett Gallery and hear him talk about the stories featured in the exhibition. Also on hand will be distinguished photographer Robert McFarlane to engage in a wider discussion about documentary photography.
There’s also something a little too expedient about the collection and its announcement. Last year, H&M and its coordinating public relations teams kept us guessing for days before they finally revealed that Lanvin’s Alber Elbaz would design a collection for the brand. This time there were no frantic emails to the people at Paul Wilmot begging for clues, no series of videos planted as misdirection — no hunt at all. And, you know, we’re glad to have the story, but sometimes it feels better to have to work for it, even just a little.
And then I get up.
In 1952 Jim and Robert Mitchum got into a fight with two henchman of mobster Mickey Cohen, who had been bothering a cigarette girl at the Brown Derby. One of the thugs pulled out a .38 and shot wildly, hitting Jim just above the heart. At the hospital Jim refused sedation and insisted that a studio secretary be summoned so he could dictate the final pages of a screenplay due the next day. That script went on to win an Academy Award.
Into the forest
To be sure, it has been tough to find robust returns in any markets over the last five years. While the median return for private equity investments held by public pension funds was 7.2 percent annually, hedge funds returned only 2.74 percent, according to Wilshire TUCS. Likewise, global bonds earned 6.99 percent while global equities rose 3.68 percent.
Coronation Street: Stephanie Cole (Sylvia Goodwin) - WINNER
In this same article Gilbert and Ito Yuki offer translations of some haiku by this generation of persecuted poets, all of which, naturally, are a little on the dark side — but exhibit the same freshness of approach as my previous examples:
Most of us have times when we meet people but cannot recall their names or put a name to a face but the temperament general disposition of that person is more likely to linger in our memory. How often have you failed to recall someone's name, or whether a person wears glasses or has a moustache.
It was a STUNNING day. We saw so much wildlife! And butterflies were everywhere.
FLs 7
The click of a pair of heels as a woman scurries pst
Kerry (D-MA)
Until...
Premiere Vision, Hall 6
Using a variety of colours i chose to use the smallest heart on the sizzlet for this first card. I used the embossed houndstooth heart and added a short greeting banner. The key is also facing up. AND yes i cut out the DSP to shape the zig zag!...i hear gasps...! Trust me, it didn't take long at all and cutting is part of paper crafting.....right..? ; )
Garlic, 3 cloves, minced (OPTIONAL)
A detail photo of the butterflies…I added pearls to the butterfly spine. The first is made with liquid pearls and the bottoms two are adhesive pearls. I added machine stitching to follow the sketch layout instead of another layer of cardstock.
Why this sudden goal in life you ask? Well I guess I just want to have a good time at the moment in life. Im feeling quite sad for myself, falling out with my ex has meant I lost my BEST FRIEND EVER... It feels weird these past few months doing activities without him, we used to go cinema, bike-riding, shopping, picnics, road-trips. But now its just me and the wind to remind me how cold and lonely it is for me now :(
Q: Why are you blogging?
Barbeque
I'm in the quilting stage for my sweet little baby quilt.
Once upоn а time, the focus оn Halloween centered arоund children dressed in costumes running frоm house tо house gathering аs many candy treats as thеу could. In the past few decades, Halloween haѕ rapidly gained acceptance bу adults scantly dressed іn costumes, traveling tо parties аnd bars gathering prizes for thеіr muсh mоrе adult styled attire. The transition frоm spooky аnd scary to sexy and seductive сan be made with the hеlp оf theѕе fіve easy steps:
The owner of a local resort in Komatipoort also confirmed that a black woman was found murdered on his property this weekend. He said her body was found in the corridor between the unpatrolled border-fence and the railway lines next to the N4 highway in South Africa. This narrow corridor is used daily by immigrants to cross illegally -- and the property owner claimed that on some days there were nearly 70 people walking through.
We are celebrating our first birthday with lots of new prizes.
I just know it.
The SIJS noted put out a press release stating that “the institute decided to grant equal forum to the perspectives prevalent within the Conservative movement in the true spirit of the school, and our Jewish sages who respected each other’s rulings and opinions in spite of conflicts and disagreements.
the cool.
* Our cottage used to be owned by Archie Day, the village coffin maker who used what is now the garage as his workshop. Just across the road from the churchyard, it must have been very handy...
03 Cause to be alarmed
whoever eats this bread will live forever.”
In essence, one could describe this action by municipal police as legalized-forced-panhandling. A homeless Vet can only hold up a sign and ask for money. But the police have the self-derived authority to force drivers to pay them ridiculous amounts of money without committing any real crime at all. No victim, no crime.
Previously, in Teen Titans: The Teen Titans returned to the Antarctic base of the mysterious organisation NOWHERE in order to rescue Superboy, who had been sentenced to death. Once there, they were brought face to face with the villainous leader of NOWHERE, Harvest, who easily defeated them and offered them to Omen, another teenage metahuman who preyed on their darkest fears in order to subjugate them whilst preparations for the Culling ritual were made.
But he owns this fucking shitting home."
Because of the budget deficit in California the state is planning to close a bunch of state parks including one called Pescadero State Beach. Pescadero means "place to go fishing."
3) Fresh, non-pastuerized juice made at home can preserve more nutrients than you get from store-bought juices, making them a healthier choice (less sugars, preservatives, etc).
The only problem with that is that the climate is not changing -- not to any perceptible extent. But it is variable, and that is likely to be the message of climate alarmists for some time.
Oh yeaahhhh!!!
Today it snowed! Usually by this time of year I'm tired of snow and am ready for spring, but we haven't really had snow in this part of Massachusetts since the freak ice storm in October. So, for now I'm thoroughly enjoying being able to glance out the window during class to see snowflakes drifting by.
I practice being patient by moving from one task to another. I try not to get too frustrated with various steps of a complicated or intense project at hand because of those little breaks.
1. PURPOSE
I had a sister born on this day and the Girl Scouts in my home town Mt Vernon Illinois decided to adopt the first baby born on this special day. By adopting meaning they would throw this child a big birthday party every year until the child was 6 years old honoring the child because it was born on this special day .
First, with a month left until our wedding, and a supposed week left until my procedure to remove the pre-cancerous cells from my cervix, Dave and I found out last week that we are expecting! We are extremely excited, as are the boys, and are calling it “Boo” due to the promoxity of its due date to Halloween.
Living in a country where most are Catholics, everyone looks forward to the Holy Week as it means having the most awaited days off from work. Most of my fellowmen take advantage of this week to go out of town or visit other countries. In my case, I grew up in a family who chose to have quality time at home. When my paternal grandmother was still alive, we have our annual family reunion. We feast to healthy local delicacies that my grandma prepares for us. How I wish our family could revive this tradition in a better place. Having family reunions to a rest house in Tagaytay or even in Antipolo will do.
Most of you will agree with me, I know; it is a powerful story, the moral of which is supposed to be ‘not everything appears as it is on face value’. But no, I am not a motivational speaker no will I ever be. Rather, the story got me thinking. Imagine if the poor fellow opened his eyes and the first thing he saw in 25 years was a typical Kenyan television show. The shock and dismay he would get equals that if he regained his eyesight and the first thing he saw was Chelsea beating Barcelona courtesy of a Torres goal after Messi messed a pelanty.
We spoke more about the fact that he knows what he needs to do, while he made sure I got to my bus stop. He wanted to be sure I got there, because to him, I was in worse shape than he, so he was my attendant to get me to safety.
with your heart and soul.
An example might be your uncle Ed. He is family and you do not see him all that often. He gets a bit wild at family reunions and seems to draw everyone else in. You can not really cut ties with him because he is family, but you can minimize the amount of time you spend with him.
This is where we read the student expectations before beginning calendar. It's hard to see, but she is actually holding up the expectations here. We recite it with the kiddos - and yes the kids LIKE reciting them!
I was totally oblivious to what was about to become “the-day-o-fish.” You see, I probably brought 1/2 a cup of cod to work, heated it up to make fish tacos, and quickly ate them. It wasn’t until I ate my last bite that one of my co-workers started sniffing around and came by the cube my friend and I were sitting in. She pointed at me….”Is that you!?”
Hello and welcome to Lula Lingerie!! Would you like to know a little more about us?
If you have considered attending the Gun Blogger Rendezvous, this is definitely the year to be there. You don't have to be a blogger to attend, either. The Rendezvous is open to not only the Gun Bloggers, but to everyone who has similar interests, including industry folks, the NRA, The National Shooting Sports Foundation, competition shooters, and more. There will be attendees from New York, New Jersey, Ohio, and all over the United States.
No one believed Noah. Of all who lived at the time, only the eight immediate members of his family followed him in this. God was going to send rain. It never had rained. What was that? There was going to be a universal flood. That also was strange to them. It never had happened, no not in the history of the world. To them it was foolishness.
The third reason to study economics is that economics helps one to understand global affairs. International events often have incredible economic impacts. Wars are a prime example. WWII was a catalyst in making the U.S. a global economic superpower. European countries had their manufacturing capacity lost due to the destruction from bombing. Other examples could include how global affairs and economics intersect the foreign policy of the United States and how it relates to OPEC and our need for oil, or the debt crisis happening in Europe and the effects it will have not only in Europe but in the United States as well. Economics has both local and global impacts. It is important to understand both.
Here is my halloween pumpkin, sorry I couldn't turn off the flash.
Sri Padmanabha Aital was a scholar of the Vedas, Vedangas, Upanishads, Dharmasastras, Purnanas, Ithihasas and so much more.
I created this frame for a Benefit our town is having for a young man who was injured in a car accident. His face was burned on one side and he is having several surgeries to fix this. I created this frame for the auction to help raise money for the medical expenses.
If you decide that the cupcake version of this is calling your name, here's what you need to do. I used a jumbo cupcake pan for this. Place one of the noodles in the cupcake tin. Top with the meat or veggie filling. Add the cheese filling and some mozarella cheese. Add in another piece of noodle, and top with more sauce and cheese and bake on 400 for 10 min, reduce the oven temperature to 350 and bake for an additional 20 minutes. They'll come out perfect.
The Darent flows southwards beneath ash, sycamore and alder, their canopies reflected, shimmering, in the faintly rippled surface of the barely moving river; an enormous collapsed field maple lies adjacent to the riverside path, sprawling like a drunkard; songbirds flit from branch to branch; in the clear water, darting shadows hint at the presence of fish. An idyllic scene along a typical lowland chalk stream – but one which a few years ago may have been less vibrant. From being one of the finest trout rivers in the country, the river suffered from pollution and over-abstraction during the 20th century, many stretches running dry during drought years. But over recent years, as a plaque by the path commemorates, the Darent was the subject of a restoration programme – which seems to have been thoroughly successful.
In 1983, Leo claims that he stood in a group of about 20 tourists at the bottom of the ski lift that were all entranced by what they were watching take place on the side of the steep hill in town. Leo says that nearly 2/3 of the way up the hill was a lone, apparent female figure, dressed in what appeared to be a blue dress, making it’s way up the mountain with apparent ease and without the use of any kind of hiking stick or any other type of gear. Whereas a normal hiker would practically be crawling on hands and knees trying to scale the hill, this figure in a blue dress was literally gliding up the hill at an amazing speed. Leo did as many of the tourists were doing and took out his camera. Leo says he took the 6 remaining photos on his roll of film. Remember, this was 1983. No Digital Cameras back then, just hand-wound 35mm cameras with poor manual focus and zoom capabilities.
South Africa employs thousands of Basothos (nationals of Lesotho) as migrant labour, buys water from a project that in turn generates enough electricity to meet Lesotho’s needs and generously shares revenue from a customs union that contributes significantly to the tiny kingdom’s budget. Moreover, South African companies are active in other sectors, including retail trade, insurance and banking.
23. Johnny Clegg, also known as "The White Zulu", musician (1953 - )
Entering through the red stone ornate gateway to see the Taj Mahal for the second time, I choked up with such a joy that all I could do was stand there and drown in trembles while a continuous loop of audio played in my head, “I can’t believe I’m here. I can’t believe I’m here. Thirteen years after completing a work contract in Delhi and falling in love with this story, I can’t believe I got to see this again.”
If judgment looms under every steeple
Right before I start worrying too much, over-analyzing myself to death, stressing unnecessarily over things that are out of my control— something happens. Something so extreme that it knocks me back on my two sturdy feet and grounds me.. opening my eyes to how petty these “issues” are that I’m stressing about.
Any thought of this nature is only a pipe dream. Not everything is free in this world, not even water, clean air and nature’s abundance of crops.
Other print styles included are snake prints and floral prints. If snake prints are combined to be fairly subtle, floral prints are a whole other story. In a dominant color tone with minor variations or in wild combos, these prints are anything but traditional looking. Forget discretion and barely distinguishable prints for the upcoming months and focus on expanding your style limitations instead.
For someone who seems to hate children so much, he did include a New Rule about a children’s book that I remember hearing about and promptly forgot.
To be honest, I don't feel like doing anything at all. I have been in a really, really good mood for a couple of days now ~ but I feel that's about to change. I blame no one, it's all my own fault.
Thank-you. You’re one of the few that have faith in me. You see the good in me when I can’t even see it. I won’t make this ending cheesy because no one likes cheesy right? Simply put. You’re awesome and you can see me in a light not many can. That means the world.
Man is valuable in the sight of God but those things man possesses surely are not. Well, they could be if given over to the Lord to be used in the work of the Lord. I said earlier that you can’t take it with you but you can send it on ahead. By investing your money in missions, for the cause of evangelism, for the work of the Lord, you will be rewarded at the judgment seat of Christ. “Only one life, ‘twill soon be past; only what’s done in Christ will last.”
President Aquino has appealed to us to spare his love life and yet he keeps on talking about it. I wonder why the President is acting this way. I don’t know if his reputation makers have noticed that the President appears childish when he talks about beautiful women, about his love, about not being married. If he was just kidding or just wanted to make things light, then it doesn’t make sense at all.
he will never let the righteous fall.”
The challenge theme for this month is April Showers. Use anything watery on your project, a water technique as Paula has here, or anything water themed, think mermaids and seaside. Your water technique can be as simple as water colour paints or pencils or using some of the lovely ink sprays available from the shop. Let your imagination run wild.
They are really cool.
Being from the paramilitary wing of the Anglican Church I wonder whether my participation at an ordination is rather heretical. I stare blankly at the staggering amounts of pink and grey marble and gold filigree work and statues of the bleeding Jesus and the Madonna with her tacky crown of electric candles and wonder at the utter lack of spirituality that for me is the singular hallmark of Catholic places of worship. And then from the choir gallery I see all the new priest's young friends from his village beaming with pride, young children playing in the aisles, couples cuddling and people talking on their mobiles and think maybe this is the way a living church should be. Shortly afterwards Bruno says from the back of the gallery, "hey Ron, we've just opened a bottle of grappa that Giorgio gave me, you must have a glass."
I feel like writing. So it’s 01:17am and here i am wanting to talk nonsense. So what is going on with me? Well i’m attempting to become a faithful blogger, because i can never remember to update stuff on here. Anyhow…
“Lord Jesus, you are the Good Shepherd who secures what is best for us. In you I place all my hope and trust. Open my ears to hear your voice and follow your commands.” http://www.rc.net/wcc/readings/may1.htm
He has to be the signing of the season. He joined Newcastle from West Ham in the summer for nothing and has been Magpies star of the season scoring sixteen goals in thirty-one league appearances. His outstanding goal scoring record has generated a lot of interested from the top Premier League clubs including the likes of Tottenham and Liverpool, who need a regular goal-scorer. There were also some news in January that he had a release clause in his contract which could see him leave the club for less than £10m. It will be a real blow for Newcastle if Ba does leave the club next season but it wont be happening because the Magpies are guaranteed a spot in the next season’s Europa League if they fail to qualify for the Champions League and that’s what a player wants – to play in Europe.
As fate would have it, the forum we have been using to discuss the trial is down for maintenance. In the meantime, I’ve opened a Verdict Watch thread at our original forum.
japanese beetle
The resolution to this issue (the last in the series), sees Moon Knight replacing two of his personalities with different because, hey why not? They also set him up to be involved in the upcoming Ultron based storyline that Marvel has been hinting at for the majority of the last three years.
So there you have it, Salty not only seems to run, but it goes down the road. It isn't the most comfortable bike in the world, but it is actually doable on the road. I just fold up my long legs, hunch over, and go for it. I'm going to fiddle with a few more things this afternoon, and hopefully take him around the block more before the rain comes this weekend.
It's starting to get light out and the day will officially begin. If I'm smart, I will take the dog for a walk early. It will be good to get the first fresh air and to be out there before anybody else is.
The punctuation in the third sentence makes the sentence awkward. I think you're using it here to mean a pause. Generally dashes meaning a pause are used as interruptions, from one speaker to another. The reason this doesn't work is what follows: the clause both morally and physically, he cannot act as his own executioner.
That sparkled on the yellow field,
so I would advise against choosing a color based on something you've seen online.
Actor Jo Jung Suk proved he is loyal to King Lee Seung Gi.
I have always wanted to drive one.
I just ordered the coolest new devotional materials for the kids. I am SO excited. I have been looking for something that is an active devotion type material. Apologia just put out a biblical worldview series, like-why we believe what we believe. I knew there had to be something out there to make devotion time a little more real world and active.
Eventually, after years of depression, Von Rectangle drove his car into a parking space too tight for him even to open his door to get out of the car. Locking the car doors and throwing the ignition key away, Von Rectangle there committed suicide by gluing his seat belt in place around himself and tuning his car radio to Radio 1.
While cleaning out and decluttering, I found a box of Joe's stuff (high school yearbooks, photo albums of his baby pictures, etc.) According to the divorce agreement, everything left here is mine. He took what was his and made no accommodations to retrieve anything else. I considering having a bonfire, and burning him in effigy. I also thought about writing up stories with all the details of his horribleness and listing the items on eBay. In the end, I opted to text him and let him know I had a box of his stuff if he wanted to come pick it up. That was my good deed for the year.
Remember to say what prize you would like. You can choose either one of my books or some of my tacky merchandise.
It is rational to fear people who commit anti-social acts. (And no, Freudian psychologists, I am not referring to people who refuse to bathe.) People that drink heavily, then drive; criminals; violent and cruel individuals, etc.
Cheating a little, I know, but I thought would be fun now and then to look back at some of the posts I've written for ABBA awfully big blog adventure
People earning more than $300,000 a year will have the tax on their superannuation contributions doubled to 30 per cent.
And delightful to watch others´horror.
commitment to
One for each member of our family. I want to transfer all our 72-hour stuff into these. Some of our stuff is already in backpacks, but not rolling ones. And some is in boxes. I want everything uniform and clearly marked. Also, these should give us more than enough room for everything including one backpack full of spare outfits. (Should be pretty light--Gray can pull that one!)
Catholic ABC's runs here at Catholic Icing every Wednesday with the new letter of the week. You can get the details of this program by checking out the Classroom Script.
Adorning me
The first little project is this Fancy Favor Box with the script paper from Attic Boutique adhered behind the front and also on the inside back. I cut a hole with one of the Labels Framelits so that when I decide what buttons, brads and/or ribbon to include as their gift (likely something from the new catalog), it will be displayed. I typically update their SU! color rings with the new In Colors (and provide them to new members), so I will definitely include the new 2012-2014 colors. I saw the rolled paper roses on Pinterest, but I apologize that since the poster had not linked to the original post, but to flickr instead (which when clicked shows pictures of postage stamps on flickr) I don't know "from whence they came :). I think my guests will love how easy they are! The Pool Party and So Saffron mimic the roses on the designer series paper though I used River Rock for my leaves and just sponged them in Soft Suede. I added some dazzling details glitter glue to the edges for shine.
Early packaging was in returnable bottles, a popular move in the conscious community of Chico. When they wanted to expand outside of Chico another method was needed. The “Heritage” bottle was chosen because all of the other designs available then were proprietary. Kegging began when they acquired some of A-B's old bung-sided Golden Gate kegs for $15 each.
These are reasons to awake unto God’s will and His Glory for He has more in store for us.
“I Want to Hold Your Hand,” “Breaking Up is Hard to Do,” “Dance the Night Away:” these are three of the most well-worn lyrical themes found in pop songs. But dig a little deeper into the 20th and 21st century songbook, and you’ll discover a large and varied repertoire of music directly inspired by the prison experience. In fact, there are so many examples in blues, country, rock, and hip hop of songs about prison, that you could argue getting locked up is as common a subject for a song lyric as boy meets girl. Here are 10 classic songs, most of them widely known, that support this point.
Collect data on children's and parents' response to intervention.
Fire’s bigger than flames
1) “First Thing We Do, Let’s Kill All The Economists”
Have amazing sex....twice.
6. Check the produce bargain counter at Sendik's
If it wasn't for YOU and all your support
Tomato - 1 cup, sliced
will be worth
4) Queen (then Princess) Sonja of Norway
We do not offer any downloads on this site and we don't link to any downloads directly either.
It’s also important to avoid taking your stress out on your employees. You may be going through a difficult time and have less patience for mundane work, but be careful with how you treat those people you work with. The worst possible situation is for employees to leave the company because of a negative work environment that you’ve created due to your divorce.
Other things to look forward to are two concerts coming up, of artists/bands I’ve always wanted to see. So that’s really exciting. Plus there’s a family trip to Maine, several graduation parties (my family and Rudy’s this year), and nice weather to look forward too. Starting in September I’ll be purchasing things I’ll need for an apartment to try to spread the costs out a little bit. Rudy puts in for his transfer in the fall and we’ll start to make more official plans then. How cool is that? Before I know it I’ll be moving out on my own with Rudy to a new apartment, learn to deal with all that comes with that, and I’ll really be on my way then! It’s an exciting time for me. And I’m going to do my hardest to keep up with it all and not to let anything (or anyone) pull me down.
But not Barack Obama. He can’t get beyond his narcissism, as Klein says, because, trapped within it, he can’t see it for the self-absorption it is. Instead, it is a simple fact: All His 43 predecessors are merely His heralds, lighting the way to Him.
I guess the point is - every breakup is different. There's a grieving process (denial, anger, bargaining, depression, accpetance) that you sort of follow - but it never gets easier. Like a good friend said to me, "After each, you have better tools - but you still have to figure out how they apply to the next."
Now, the die hard fans among us will have heard about these books at the end of last year. It was assumed at that point that Elisabeth Sladen would be reading them, as she had done with the previous SJA audios, but due to her sad passing earlier this year and no word on what would happen with the stories, we feared the worse.
You are loved! God bless you all.
Then fourteen years after I went up again to Jerusalem with Barnabas, and took Titus with me also. And I went up by revelation, and communicated unto them that gospel which I preach among the Gentiles, but privately to them which were of reputation, lest by any means I should run, or had run, in vain. But neither Titus, who was with me, being a Greek, was compelled to be circumcised: And that because of false brethren unawares brought in, who came in privily to spy out our liberty which we have in Christ Jesus, that they might bring us into bondage: To whom we gave place by subjection, no, not for an hour; that the truth of the gospel might continue with you. But of these who seemed to be somewhat, (whatsoever they were, it maketh no matter to me: God accepteth no man’s person:) for they who seemed to be somewhat in conference added nothing to me: But contrariwise, when they saw that the gospel of the uncircumcision was committed unto me, as the gospel of the circumcision was unto Peter; (For he that wrought effectually in Peter to the apostleship of the circumcision, the same was mighty in me toward the Gentiles:) And when James, Cephas, and John, who seemed to be pillars, perceived the grace that was given unto me, they gave to me and Barnabas the right hands of fellowship; that we should go unto the heathen, and they unto the circumcision. Only they would that we should remember the poor; the same which I also was forward to do.
6 What is your favorite season? And why? I love autumn in Virginia. The leaves turn the colors of pomegranate, oranges, limes and yellow squash blossoms and the air is crisp and cool. My birthday is October 25, followed a week later by Halloween! Pumpkins, jack-o-lanterns, apple pie, apple cider, trick-or-treaters, and trips to the apple orchard. What could be better than that?
6) Pour the mixture into the rice. Stir well.
The foundation contributed $25,000 to the Mayor's Fund in 2004 (below).
Tapata opens up Side B with some groovy blues flavored electric guitar work, before transforming into a showcase of funky, rolling percussion work, which is reminiscant of some of the percussion work of artists I have recently featured on the blog, such as Patrice Sciortino and Camille Sauvage. Tapatapa was sampled by the Beatnuts for their song "Contact". I consider "Ballet Mecanique" to be another one of the strongest tracks on the album. It opens up with a hauntingly beautiful harpsichord solo, which is gradually overtaken by a killer funky bassline. A hard-driving beat kicks in soon after that gallops along at a frantic pace to set the stage for the absolutely ripping guitar solo that kicks in soon afterward. The whole process is repeated before the pace dies down one last time, allowing the harpsichord to close out the track just as it began. As the name suggests, "Funky Stage" lays down the funk in a heavy way. The funky bassline is accompanied by some psychedelic guitar work with a touch of blues and hammond organ, and closes out the album just as strongly as it began.
Never true
Well, I suppose we'll keep it at that then....
Before my trip, I was becoming a bit neglectful of his leash time,
1956-59 Your Hit Parade (associate producer)
"That's great," I said, "and it's good that you know because now you can push it and be the hero." She smiled.
I'm not sure, but I think that they usually don't bloom until later in the summer.
This is a copy and paste of my former client, who has joined the Peace Corps, serving in Africa.
Myself and Dave got quite a lot done today. We filled the sixth bed with topsoil and rejoiced that they were finally all done! I’m hoping to add in four more later in the year when I’ve harvested my potatoes and onions, but, for now, no more wheelbarrowing and hopefully no more sieving! I also filled my small raised bed today and planted some strawberries. I covered them with fleece for tonight to try to protect them from the wind, it will probably do no good but it’s worth a try. I’ll put some netting around them in a few weeks to protect them from birds, who cannot resist eating the fruit. I also planted three raspberry plants. I drove two stakes into the ground and ran three lengths of wire between them, this will act as a support for the bushes, which they need as they get bigger.
Judge: Aubrey Poole
In the game you play the fabled character of War. One of the four horsemen of the apocalypse. You get thrown right into the fray and also literally right into the end of the world, as far as biblical scripture is concerned at least. As the introductory movie ends you find yourself in a city enveloped by chaos. Devils and angels are fighting it out in an epic world end struggle and you quickly find yourself in the middle of it as the horsemen has been summoned. But something is wrong, you seem to have only a fraction of the strength you should. This leads to a rollercoaster epic journey through biblical myth and mythology as a age old conspiracy slowly unveils itself.
Featuring several members of the original 1978 cast, the big-budget musical finally gave the album the bombast and special effects it deserved, up to and including a holographic projection of the head of since-deceased Richard Burton speaking his lines courtesy of a CGI mouth and lower jaw. No, I'm not kidding.
The dies are:
I got us another beer and said nothing else about it.
As Zet and his sister wind their way through the streets of Thebes, the scents and sounds and activity of the thriving commercial city come alive. They meet many people in their quest from the man who grows papyrus to make into paper, to the blind lady on the side of the road, to the merchants in the market, to the high priest of the sacred Temple of Amenenopet. But they are not all as they seem. To save their family, Zet and Kat must learn who to trust, who has evil motives and what those evil motives are.
Summers are just not long enough for kids and those who love spending time with their kids. But it has come to that time where we send them off in their new clothes with their new books to learn new things. It is an exciting time and can be quite nerve-racking. Our little rug rats are growing up!
Give me my warm honey drizzle and lemon drink; Let me take a long long swig.
Help you start over…embrace your now
The other beers that I've tried from them so far - Milk Stout (deliciously bittersweet), Southville Hop (heady, hoppy, American-accented), Exhibition (big, old-fashioned, nutty) have helped flesh out that impression, and framed an opinion about them, and that opinion is highly favourable. In fact, I'd go so far as to say that one of their beers, their New World Tripel collaboration with Arbor Ales, is one of the most enjoyable British-brewed beers I've had the pleasure of drinking this year. It's a riot of peach and apricot fruitiness, finishing with some cakey spiciness (ginger, mace). Delicious, and ruinously drinkable at 6.8%abv, I'd emailed them to ask if they had any more before I'd finished the first bottle.
9. Do you prefer indie companies or cooperate companies to buy your makeup from?
Pick dried apricots over and wash with warm water. Put apricots into a pot and cover with boiling water, simmer 10-15 minutes. Drain apricots in a colander, then put on prepared dough and sprinkle with sugar.
Ann
Listening to one’s godself is love. Living the kind of life that engenders loving self is love. Feeling joy yourself when you see it in others is love.
Priest or Eucharistic Minister: The Body/Blood of Christ.
The only photo from April that hasn't been shared is my SUPER DUPER GENIUS IDEA. Homework usually takes a long time around here because the boys can't do homework at the same time (they read to us). Last night Alex had to write down sight words so I had Nate read the sight words to Alex.... leaving me free to do nothing. HAPPY HAPPY DAY!
Meigs Creek trail winds up and over a western ridge of Curry He Mountain, and then up a fairly narrow draw following the banks of Meigs Creek which ultimately drains into the Little River. The Little Brown Book says that this is a good trail to practice your rock-hopping skills, and suggests that the many creek crossings can be difficult or dangerous when the water is high. It's been hot and dry for a while now, so the 18+ creek crossings were no problem for me today. Here's an example of one of the lower crossings.
Now for the big question---"Did you force her or did she want to do it ?"----It was her idea--she wanted to try it and so did I.
Wadmalaw Island, one of the sea islands just south of Charleston. We took a tour in a trolley that was converted into a bus. There they were, acres and acres of bushes that we learned were Camellia Sinensis tea plants. So this tea is a cousin of the beautiful flowering camellias found all over the southeast!!
Click the icon for your instant Aussie Franciscan-Roman Calendar for 2012.
Michelle :o)
It is true in some peoples’ world, in one way or another. Someone might have a loved one called Oscar, maybe someone will. I don’t know really, but I am not going to discuss any loved Oscar but one… The Oscar you get at the Academy Awards, it is a loved one and honorable to win. I have never liked to follow this circus, it has to do with two facts and those are easy. It is always night where I live when it is held and I have never been interested in any event like these, awards basically. But just the other day I thought about it and realized that how many times haven’t you been standing there trying to decide which film you should watch. ‘Let see, well this one has good actors and it doesn’t seem to bad, but on the other hand this one has good actors and have been nominated for x Oscars (and won x Oscars.)’ Every time that is the case with me I tend to end up with the one with Oscars because most of the time that is a film in my taste even though I might like the other film just as much.
~ James Russell Lowell
Rex, Robert.
Henry Ford, the founder of the Ford Motor Company, and the creative force behind an industry of unprecedented size and wealth that in only a few decades permanently changed the economic and social character of the United States, once said, “Whether you think you can or you can’t, either way, you’re right.” Not everyone can aspire to be as famous or wealthy as he, or other such entrepreneurs, like for example, Richard Branson and Bill Gates, but in our own way we can make our dreams come true with a positive attitude and hard work.
Louis Berkhof:
I hope you enjoy warmer temperatures soon where you are!
And did I mention my hearing?
I phoned his father and explained the situation. He knew who I was; his family and my father’s family originally came from the same corner of north Roscommon and there may even have been some distant marital connection a couple of generations back. He grasped the situation quickly without me having to go into many details and less than an hour later he and his wife turned up at the hotel.
And no one feared his look, forehead and eye were gracefully benign…
How cute are these fox pillows by Elsie? I found them over at What Anna Loves, and now I'm inspired to make some cushions, pillows, whatever, of my own. I'm just not sure where to begin. Instead today I went hunting for white tights (unsuccesfully) then came home and read. I'm in a very lazy mood, I'm very grateful for the three day weekend, I will be needing it for homework!
Cause there's only one time
I realized that I started the whole "weight loss journey" 2 years ago yesterday. How in the world has 2 years gone by already? And how in the world have I managed to not only lose about 60 pounds (give or take depending on the day), but I've kept if off for a year on top of that!
I’m pretty sure that over the course of the two day festival I ran up and down enough stairs that would be the equivalent of climbing the Eiffel Tower a few times over. Did I mention that I sprinted through pouring rain to hunt down an announcer? Well I just mentioned it. But I won’t lie here. I think I looked pretty damn sexy jogging through this venue completely drenched.
Outback Brewery Pty Ltd Outback Ale
A beautiful,
Aside from being sick and getting The Historic House By The Water ready for the new tenants, and I had to find a replacement for my long time resident at The Pad By The Sea. Which meant advertising the bejebus out of the place and forwarding it to all of my contacts and stressing out about holding a vacancy and traveling to South Florida for showings. Only to have three full price offers on it in less than fifteen minutes after the first three showings. Who knew?
I was so fortunate to WIN a signed one thousand gifts by Ann Voskamp...what a complete surprise! That's the second time I've won a book from a blog and I'm not the winning type. No million dollars from a McDonald's scratch off, no million dollar dream home from HGTV, nothin!! But this book is so dear to my heart and I know the Lord knows that, so what a precious gift to receive while battling shingles, nonetheless. I have it on my Kindle, but it's just not the same. It's the kind of book that will be so marked up, so highlighted, so tear stained, so looooooooooooooooved, that an e-reader just can't cut the mustard. Her poetic style of writing must be read slowly and digested in little bits.
Being as I had been in the waiting room for eight hours at that point, and all I could really think about is "Is she alive or not," I did not, at that time, really think this through. But, friends, as I'm typing, I'm suddenly sort of realizing that this shit shouldn't have gone down this way, no pun intended.
Fringe being recorded by the DVR.
Telugu Movie Title : Ranga The Donga
I did not take pics of this step. Just visualize a white dresser and drawers... much like the primered version. I used 2-3 coats to fully cover.
Florence Henri (1 gelatin silver print, 1928)
Remove the steamer basket and drain the water from the large pot. Transfer the potatoes and garlic to the pot, add the oil, salt, pepper,onion powder, sour cream and broth and mash until smooth.
Serve with warm biscuits. I like to serve with either Tea Biscuits (I'll post another time) or Pillsbury crescent rolls (if short on time).
“Me! Me! Me! Me!” came the predictable response.
I have been watching so many nice tags on other blogs lately,
Peru is a goldmine for anyone interested in dyeing. In previous blogs, I’ve talked about the cochineal beetle, which is native to Peru. Properly mordanted, the blood of these beetles creates a vivid red.
This does explain a lot as to how I have been feeling lately though. Usually when I'm hungry my tummy's rumbling and I may get a little crabby. Lately though it feels like my entire body is weak. Like I don't want to hold the phone to my ear weak. So I eat something and depending on what I eat, I feel better or worse. I've been noticing if I have a handful of cashews or a protein shake made with blueberries, I feel better. If I grab an apple or some crackers, I feel worse. Good to know there is a reason behind it and I can start to plan my meals accordingly now.
It’s a great way unwind, albeit briefly.
But never fear I didn't let the week pass without doing some sewing. I keep my embroidery on the couch beside me so I get a few stitches in when I sit down to watch television in the evenings.
Gentlemen, although it is imperfectly that we have been enabled by his grace to understand the sublime messages of our Ācāryadeva, Oṁ Viṣṇupāda Paramahaṁsa Parivrājakācārya Śrī Śrīmad Bhaktisiddhānta Sarasvatī Gosvāmī Mahārāja, we must admit that we have realized definitely that the divine message from his holy lips is the congenial thing for suffering humanity. All of us should hear him patiently. If we listen to the transcendental sound without unnecessary opposition, he will surely have mercy upon us. The Ācārya’s Message is to take us back to our original home, back to God. Let me repeat, therefore, that we should hear him patiently, follow him in the measure of our conviction, and bow down at his lotus feet for releasing us from our present causeless unwillingness for serving the Absolute and all souls.
Have a great rest of April and May and I’ll be back in June!
One day when I watched he poked out his head,
He sits up, "Well i had to do something to get back in the good books."
With cookies, doughnuts, tarts and other pastries on the Cowgirl menu, just blocks from home, I am in trouble. I am in heaven—but I am in trouble.
We’ve all heard the declarations that “thousands and thousands of people have been healed of their homosexuality.” Where do those numbers come from? At Beyond Ex-Gay (bXg) we know firsthand that the thousands who have attended ex-gay groups never “changed.” Worse yet, our ex-gay experiences caused us tremendous
Not too much frills, no lace, just paper (paperbloc Sweet Romance from Marianne Design)
Wheatgrass contains chlorophyll, which increases hemoglobin production. Selenium and laetrile are also in wheatgrass, and both are anticancer. Chlorophyll and selenium also help build the immune system. Chlorophyll also benefits heart function, the vascular system, the uterus, intestines, and lungs. Dr. Yoshihide Hagiwara, president of the Hagiwara Institute of Health in Japan, believes that since chlorophyll is soluble in fat particles, and fat particles are absorbed directly into the blood via the lymphatic system, that chlorophyll can also be absorbed in this way. In other words, when the “blood” of plants is absorbed in humans it is transformed into human blood, which transports nutrients to every cell of the body.
To pass for one of The Boys,
Considering the majority of festival attendees are aged between 16 and 30 this is most certainly a wise move. However, this has not stopped 2012 being one of the worst years for ticket sales.
Paper Lace: K&Co﻿
Because of the current economic situation, no one knows for sure when it will make a full recovery. Therefore, I'm in no rush to finish school and get a job. I'm still very unsure as to where I'm heading with my career as a photographer. My plan for these next few semesters is to broaden my knowledge and decide where I'd like my photography career to begin.
I’m debating whether or not to re-join the school committee for the upcoming year. My oldest daughter just started middle school and my mornings seem to be twice as hectic. Before I decide, I really need to find out what happened to those pictures they took at the breakfast that day. I’d hate for the administrators to take a close look at them, notice my scary feet and refuse to give me a pin next year.
Barb the French Bean
There is some really basic things to get started, however with respect to the Arduino creators, please refer to the book Getting Started with Arduino book until the end of page 38. You should be able to get that LED to blink on your own!
Here is this week's menu. I'm trying to keep it simple this week to accommodate a busy schedule and leave time for plenty of baby-hugging and tickling.
Because there are some things that you just can't find a substitute for...
P.s.s.s. Thank you Callye for giving me the idea and thank you Stephanie Kappel who did a self-portrait cookie recently that showed me it could be done awesomely! (click the links to go to their facebook pages. they will rock your socks)
Besides Bowie, his longest association was with Ian Hunter of Mott The Hoople fame, and he made substantial contributions to hits by Lou Reed and John Mellencamp
This time you have to follow a sketch.
Now, why do I think a timeline is so important? Because if you don't know what's happening on different days in your WIP than your reader sure won't. This is a great reminder to put this information into your chapters, separating events and days. If a month has passed, make sure to say a month has passed, or if it's only the next morning, say it's the next morning.
By the way, you MUST go check out Woven Home's new line of wedding pillows. If you have a wedding coming up there is no way you'll be able to pass this up as the gift (or you might just want one for yourself)!!!
Secretly, I've felt like I'm "cheating", haunted with thoughts like, "If other Photoshop users knew what I was doing they'd be appalled because I'm using this tool the wrong way!"
I gave my mother and my sister, both invited the people who invited other people, a piece of my mind. My mom accused me of being an elitist and a snob. Elitist MY FREAKING BROWN ASS. I pointed out to her that I’m her daughter, she’s not Elite, therefore I’m not. I told her I wasn’t being a snob, I was being practical. Tablewares are M.I.A because of the event, some action figures collected by my brother is also M.I.A. Being the talk of the village is not worth all the hassle and stress and valuables missing.
From Pier 84 at precisely 10:33:56, I witnessed those puffs of smoke, evidence that the great race had begun.
Certainly All-Attractive Govinda, who is so affectionate to devotees and thinkers, must be enjoying the city’s assembly hall, surrounded by well-wishers!?
PRAY RIDICULOUSLY HARD. I'm more committed than ever to praying for and with my kids. I know raising my teens into functioning adults is no walk in the park. I'm giving up before I get started and gonna cry out for Divine help and guidance constantly.
In the First part of this Year in Review i look at Off-Licences
Can you guess what it is?
So what you have to negotiate for is a royalty percentage that would be the equivalent of 10% of cover price.
Lawrence H. Schiffman, ‘Willett, “Eschatology in the Theodicies of 2 Baruch and 4 Ezra”‘, The Jewish Quarterly Review, 83 (1992), 268-69.
with Healthcare Services
I love the magic of Kate DiCamillo’s stories, the simplicity of Jeanne Birdsall’s Penderwick books and Beverly Cleary’s adventures. I would have loved Sarah Dressen as a teen. Her characters are so real. I enjoy Houston writer, Dotti Enderle’s Fortune Tellers Club series. Austin’s Cynthia Leitich Smith introduced me to the world of vampires with her paranormal books set in Texas.
At first Chloe is determined to keep her head down. But then her room mate disappears after confessing she has a poltergeist, and some of the other patients also seem to be manifesting paranormal behaviour. Could that be a coincidence? Or is Lyle House not quite what it seems…? Chloe realizes that if she doesn’t uncover the truth, she could be destined for a lifetime in a psychiatric hospital. Or could her fate be even worse…? Can she trust her fellow students, and does she dare reveal her dark secret?
Because we cling to our faith in that system. We believe, and when the going gets tough, we believe harder. The tenets of our credo are as old as our country. They endure because, historically, events have supported them often enough to convince us they’re true. Always the possibility of a reward here! They’re grounded in fundamental principles presented by Scottish philosopher Adam Smith in his classic work, The Wealth of Nations, published the same year the colonies broke away from the mother country.
This is too much ‘others’ running my life for me – No One is meant to have such control over another – unless by due process of law – in camera or out – they must KNOW!
Quick post tonight to wish all the lovely mothers a very happy Mothers day and mum if you're reading "LOVE YOU!"
I gave this some thought. The introspective me came out and wanted to write about it. Alas I had to write for work, school, and another project I am working on first. This was good, it gave me more room to think about it. I am in several situations where I want things to be a certain way. For various reasons, job availability, education, and people’s own personal choices, I feel like my hands are tied. I want the pain of longing to go away. What I want and what I have are two very different things. Reaching for them isn’t working. Working towards my goal isn’t working either. Well, it might be, but not at the speed in which I wish it to happen. Elenore Roosevelt said, “Wishing takes as much effort as planning.” Oh Elenore, I agree! But people do not share my vision for my life, my hands are tied.
In a rare moment of clarity, I realized something was amiss so I sat down and took off knee pad. My knee didn’t hurt per se, just felt….strange. In a more typical moment of idiocy, I shook it off and finished the demo. I was actually kind of pissed I disqualified myself from winning Bump-the-Bitch. I spent the rest of the weekend pracing around in various state of cosplay undress, dancing on tables, posing with Mandalorians, and nomming vodka gummy bears like ya do at a con. I was pretty much trying to ignore that I may have blown-up my knee.
some of which I must leave out.
Leaning forward in his chair, he said: “Here there were so many ugly things happening in front of me. I would see unfairness, intimidation, fraud and this moved me a step ahead from what I was used to.
It's a mess in here but it's my mess. I'm surrounded with books galore, paper and crafting 'things', you all know what that means! My favourite ornaments in a glass fronted cabinet on one side of me and a small table set up on the other. This is covered with a cloth and has a large selection of beads, crystals and pearls, where I am currently making a new new necklace. And during the day I have my phone within reach.
• We actually watched both the “Drive” and “Fast Five” trailers, said Oliver Lyttleton at Indie Wire. “Not a lot of opera in that ‘Fast Five’ trailer, is there?” This lawsuit will obviously fail, but “maybe there’s someone that Deming can sue” for her own terrible taste.
in Nigeria, he probably got a
Back in 2009, it was revealed that HFCS is actually a source of heavy metal poisoning as well. The heavy processing required to produce HFCS involves the use of caustic soda chemicals and mercury, two brain-destroying chemicals that end up in the final product fed to millions of American children (http://www.naturalnews.com/025442_HFCS_Corn_Refiners_Association.html).
A mild-mannered young gentleman just left my house; he was here installing my internet. He had a 786 cell phone number (Miami), and a thick latin accent. So I thought: maybe he's from Cuba? Turns out he is, and after a bit I ask him if he is an interesting story of how he got here. Well.
Here it was sunny but chilly,I brought my Mom some nice decorations at the cemetary and had my cry. Today is a better day!
Yet, with a handful of employees in a small office here in Reno, Apple has done something central to its corporate strategy: it has avoided millions of dollars in taxes in California and 20 other states.
The UKTI’s Overseas Market Introduction Service is a flexible business tool that lets British companies commission the services of trade teams located in overseas missions across the world. The Market Visit Support programme also provides assistance to new-to-export or new-to-market SMEs visiting overseas markets as part of their trade development process. However, in this respect, UKTI also provides some direct funding to the Welsh Government to support their own mission programmes.
541340 Drafting services
Doc Scott - Rage (Reinforced)
Slice in 1 inch slices and place on a greased cookie sheet.
My husband wasn’t fond of it when he first tried it. He wasn’t from the Ohio Valley, so that was his first mistake. His second mistake was not liking DiCarlo’s Pizza. I couldn’t wait for him to taste this wonderful thing in a cardboard box. I stared at him, waiting as he bit into its square slice for the very first time. He was quick to judge.
Why are you gonna give it up?
The music on this album, for the most part, is made up of somewhat disjunctive percussive "sounds". However the recording features a dramatic and appealing rhythm and structure. And there are enough differences from track to track to make for a listen that I found riveting throughout.
My eyes light up when she gives me the donut. "I love them." she tells me, "I can see you do too. I bet Deanna tells you off and says something like they are too fattening. Well I say, you only live once, so enjoy it as much as possible."
Connock London – Their soothing bath oil is heaven – a more exotic scent than the others with oils of kukui, macadamia and tamanu. I massage this one into my skin first and then soak in the bath – it leaves the whole body decadently soft.
The Dance Lady's phone started to ring. The ring tone was something by Mozart, I think. "What is that?" I asked.
Thu, Oct 04 Norfolk, VA Constant Convocation Center Fri, June 8
Where did Dave live? In Israel.
In Scary Movie, a teenage dork named Warren is on his way with some friends to a spooky Spook House on Halloween Night! While the friends seem excited to enter the Spook House, Warren however is not at all excited to enter because he is extremely paranoid about everything around him. When poor ol' Warren hears that a psychopathic killer named John Louis Barker is on the loose and near the Spook House, Warren's paranoia grows higher and when he enters the spook house, a man in a ghoulish costume is chasing him all over the place. Could this man in the ghoulish costume be John Louis Barker?
Wine shot from my nose. Here I am reading motivational books, seeing inspirational speakers, attending conferences, learning from other people and doing things like getting divorced in order to better my life. For my sister, all it took was a parking pass.
Last year, I had such a “chatty” group that I knew that this activity would be quite a challenge. I also had a student teacher that was supposed to be taking over for the last six weeks of the year! I must admit that I just couldn’t visualize my student teacher managing this activity with this particularly challenging group of children. There were a few of them that really never mastered keeping their thoughts to themselves during whole group activities like this, so for the first time in YEARS, we did NOT do the calendar book! I just felt that it would be an exercise in frustration for all concerned. I also really didn’t have the volunteer help to keep the calendar book updated with fresh papers each month. So I opted for more activities that we could learn from that would still allow them to talk and move around a bit more, since this seemed to suit the learning style of my group last year. We also did more journaling and more science experiments, so it all turned out okay. I can’t wait to see what next year will bring! I am hoping (and praying!) for a group that loves to sing, learns well through singing, and with lots of supportive parents. What does your “dream class” look like? :) Enjoy what is left of your summer, (if there is any of it left!) and keep on hoping and praying for that “wonder” class!
#Faulty.Thinking.sucks.
And prod me with a quick throng of wanting
However, Professor Tan does not see the update of the register as a clear sign that a by-election will be called soon.
Anyway, if we're not already friends on facebook, please friend me. I'd love to hear your updates and keep in touch even if the blog is set on silent.
Replacement theology claims that the church has “replaced” natural Israel and that the ethnic heirs of Abraham have no more place in God’s divine plan for mankind. Let’s take a look at Hagee’s assertions in light of scripture. It is true that Romans 9, 10, & 11 are about the Jewish people but first it is important to understand just who is a Jew according to Paul.
Color is golden with some not quite white head. Floral, fruity and citrus hops. It is a pretty full bodied beer and not overwhelming on the bitterness. You can really taste the oak or grains from the aging process. It was pretty good, but nothing that I will be clamoring to have again.
Before I start in on this wonderful recipe, I wanted to let you guys know that for the next couple/few weeks, until everything calms down, I may only be doing one or two posts a week. So don't worry, I'm not ditching you, I'm just going to focus on enjoying friends and family for the holidays!
But she’s already turned away.
9:20 - Jeremy calls his Dad, and I clean up the kitchen and dining room
Insurance companies won’t send checks for business losses covered under a homeowners policy. And if they discover that your family room computer was filled with business files and data, you’ll have some explaining to do before/if the company cuts you a check.
Great use of new vocabulary, Honey.
If you and your community are ready to experience healing and wholeness as the body of Christ, I encourage you to throw a healing party. Begin to pray–individually and communally–for God’s healing to come. Wuellner offers this guidance as we enter into communal prayer:
Barely over the surface
she never cries.
To my opinion a girandole is one of the most appropriate types of Christmas lighting. Don’t you agree?
Not too much to do here. For the most part, just a slight bit of EQ and volume adjustments on the UK CD singles, as well as fixing a couple of polarity issues.
“Setting aside the most important point, that there are no police free to actually do this, currently, could you tell me where’s that written down in English law?”
“I’m a homicide detective. My partner, Detective Scettico, and I are working on a
Yet teaching isn’t as simple as “Listen and you will learn” either. Sometimes students’ perverse desire to disagree isn’t perverse at all but central and necessary. You won’t learn if you aren’t ready, but being too acquiescent can be just as devastating. I once met with a student who wanted to know why she wasn’t making an “A” in my class. I affirmed her writing’s technical expertise but told her that, to develop her thinking, she had to do more than parrot discussion. She needed to offer fresh and independent observations and insights.
When we bought our house we never thought twice about it.
We found out my husband has a heart condition.
running the government than
For the next day and a half I had a hard time being motivated to look for an apartment. My hotel room was more or less comfortable, and more importantly, it had internet! I looked a a few apartments Friday, well, maybe one, and then I went to the beach, and enjoyed some tapas with some of the other assistants.
Belgium.
He shrugged. “No worries, sweetheart. What are friends for?” He smiled and beckoned her to him with his free hand. She followed the delicious smell of food more than she obeyed him, and stood beside him. He smiled at her, and pulled her into one arm hug and placed a kiss on her forehead. “Feeling better?”
One of those studies was carried out by Abigail Laymon of Indiana University, who found that “lower leg compression garments did not impact a runner’s oxygen consumption, which meant there was no change in running economy or efficiency”. The study, which tested highly trained male distance runners, also found that “calf compression garments did not have an effect on running mechanics”.
Firstly, there is no colour. This is completely sensible, because colour doesn’t feature in kissing. Kissing is not an ocular activity, but an oscular one. Although humans predominantly sense by sight, during a kiss, sensation comes from the other senses. The external world, which typically impresses itself upon us by the processing of light, is cut-off in kissing – one’s world is one’s own world, in direct contact and immediate.
Sometimes it’s amusing: “R”.
I feel longhand writing really unleashes my creativity. It sure turns my normal moody muse into a caring and helpful creature. It also sets free my blocked and choked up brain cells. For a few days I have decided to carry around the page in which I have outlined the plot, so that I can fine tune the outline and add more to it.
Dies: Lil Inkers (rainbow), My Favorite Things (heart) & Papertrey Ink (grass layers)
The number one beauty lesson we have had engrained into our brains, by our mother, is that you should always make the effort to look good (hair, clothing and make up). So we have a lot of pet peeves when it comes to fashion and beauty. We just can’t help it. Some of them make us want to scream and others makes us want to cry.
2. Have the party at home or a neighborhood park.
"... Hawass, with his usual penchant for publicity, is going around telling reporters, with no reservations, that malaria definitely killed the young king. Well, maybe, but falciparum malaria isn’t always fatal. Two of of Tut’s great-grandparents had it, and, as the authors note, they died in their 50s, and the infection might have been chronic, or suppressed by their immune systems."Already in the year 1923, as can easily be seen from a photograph of Tut's body, which is reproduced at page 297 of the 1996 British Museum Dictionary of Ancient Egypt (reproduced there courtesy of the Griffith Institute), it was well known already nearly 87 years ago that Tut had suffered a broken leg in his life and that there was a serious problem with his unequally sized feet - as can be seen from our cut-out and coloring of the lower half of that image (our added red circles show the leg break and the foot malformation):
I fucking hate Macnas. Macnas and all their parade-based countrified ilk. What the fuck even is it? Art? Art, I believe, should either have something to say about the human condition, or failing that, engender some kind of emotion in its audience. Some kind of emotion outside of a bilious "Why the fuck are these unwashed longhairs getting my tax dollars to put on crappy costumes and prance about the place like a pack of stoned show ponies?" that is. But ooh the colours! Ooh, they're so high up! Ooh, that must have taken ages! Fucking wow. Colours I can get from jamming my fists in my eyes. None of these cunts on stilts are as high as the top story of my house. And if I have a salad bowl full of muesli tonight, it's going to take me an awful long time to squeeze one out tomorrow morning. But will the exhibition of my grain fed turd be cancelled tomorrow due to high winds? It will not. This is not art. It's not even entertainment. It's just people with too much time on their hands fucking about for the distraction of other people with too much time on their hands. Forget Big Tobacco, folks, joyfully abandon Lockheed Martin. The industry that we need to bring to its knees, the one that is slowly but surely sucking the life from us all, is the one that cunningly has no official name but that I shall henceforth term 'People Creating Shit For Other People To Stand Around And Stare Vacantly At'.
Some sort of wierd warm front came though last night and it was 10 degrees celcius here this morning. It cooled off as the day progressed, but this weather is just very strange. I didn't wear a coat on our walk, just a heavy sweater. Some of the fields are green and fresh looking, and there were buds on some of the bushes. I read the Austin paper online and they were saying it might freeze or snow there...it's like winter got turned upside down.
Proof that beer is definitely as good as wine and wine as good as beer.
The final point of synthesis relates to the typological nature of circumcision. Regardless of what any others might say it seems consistent within the biblical text to connect circumcision with regeneration. This is most obvious in Colossians 2:11-12 where spiritual circumcision and regeneration is connected to baptism as opposed to physical circumcision. One interesting implication of this would be the relationship between the sealing aspect of Abrahams circumcision in Romans 4:9-11 and the sealing role of the Holy Spirit in other parts of the NT (Eph. 1:13; 4:30, 2 Cor. 1:22). Yet, such a connection would be difficult to prove based on a passing statement of Paul’s. It’s clear that the sealing role of circumcision for Abraham was quite different from that of the Holy Spirit so the relationship is somewhat ambiguous. Of course, the crucial distinction to be made is the nature of the type in physical circumcision and it’s fulfillment in the antitype of regeneration and increased freedom from sin. Regarding such a relationship Justin Martyr said: “
But if they failed to persuade South Sudanese forces withdraw from Sudanese territory, Sudan’s “armed forces will find themselves forced to use self-defense to expel the aggressor forces,” the statement said.
It's popular with walkers because its surrounded by woods and farmland rising steeply on each side of the dale. There are panoramic views of the Humber basin nearby and today Red Kites were circling in the air, often harried and harassed by smaller Kestrels. Rooks in flocks were flying hither and thither among the abundance of trees.
Happy Garden Eating! :)
Wolfgang Hampel Founder of Betty MacDonald Fan Club and Betty MacDonald Society
Key to protecting our independence from our employers will be our consistent and militant rejection of the implementation of Coalition cuts, including when this is done by Labour Councils. Councillors have to live with how they feel about engaging constructively on some issues with union reps who will denounce them and seek to defeat them on other issues. It's their job.
The reason the country is uneasy about the Obama administration's response to this attack is a distinct sense of not just incompetence but incomprehension. From the very beginning, President Obama has relentlessly tried to play down and deny the nature of the terrorist threat we continue to face. Napolitano renames terrorism "man-caused disasters." Obama goes abroad and pledges to cleanse America of its post-9/11 counterterrorist sins. Hence, Guantanamo will close, CIA interrogators will face a special prosecutor, and Khalid Sheik Mohammed will bask in a civilian trial in New York -- a trifecta of political correctness and image management.
I have to say, they really don't feel all that different from the Acuvue Define that I occasionally wear. Although I do feel my eyes getting a bit dry after about 4-5 hours. It's nothing a couple of eye drops doesn't soothe. (FYI, I have very dry eyes anyway, so I have prescription eye drops)
First then: the one we call ‘Jesus Christ our Lord’ was, quite straightforwardly, a casualty of war. He died at the hands of an army of occupation, whose commander-in-chief sentenced him first to torture and then to death, and whose foot soldiers and relatively junior officers got the job done. If we were speaking mythologically, we would say that Mars, the god of war, put Jesus, the Lord of Peace, to death. Which would also be like saying that when he was tried and sentenced and tortured and executed, Mars was doing the same to the possibility of peace. The abolition of Jesus Christ was, from the point of view of Mars (also known as Satan), the abolition of peace, and thus the abolition of love.
Selected work will be on view from June 13 through September 1, 2012.
Shamrock Rovers 4/7 (188Bet); Draw 3/1 (Betfred); Shelbourne 7/1 (Bet365)
Scott was wrongly identified by a witness and served 13 years behind bars, until the real killer confessed.
1. Hollow out a melon.
All of this sitting, shopping, and biscotti munching make a girl hungry, you know? So we headed over to Whole Foods. Now, there is probably nothing hubs and I like to eat more than sushi. We went all the time in Hong Kong but in rural Georgia the options are a little more limited. So when we tried some at Whole Foods a while ago, we were ecstatic. It's an hour drive away but we justify it somehow. Today, however, Whole Foods was PACKED. They had an Easter celebration going on, live (and loud) music, specials, everything. Which was great for business, bad for us. The sushi maker was clearly overworked and we thought about giving up but we waited....and waited...and got this as a reward:
I understand the point of view of both the restaurant and the customer in this case. I get that large groups sometimes don't tip adequately, especially not for how much work they can be for waitstaff. With good waitstaff, one large group can take up all of their time and energy for however long they stay.
(Front Row) Captain Laura Screpnek, Haylee Warkentin, Nicole Hildebrand
For Pork:
Gösta is a turbulent man—a mix of booze and ecstatic religion—and the closer he comes to destruction, the more powerful Stiller’s contrary images of steadiness become, and the more oppressive they feel. With all this and more in mind, on a cold winter’s eve, Gösta prepares to end it all. He is stopped by Margaretha, who could stop anyone.
missing how you cried watching comedeies
I am so excited that today is the first day you are able to view the new Close to My Heart Idea book on line--just click here to go to my website and see all the new products.
I learnt my lesson with my Facebook friends. I had hundreds. Many hundreds. But then I couldn't find the people I cared about in all the news rushing onto my feed. So I culled. I applied the BBQ rule - if I wouldn't invite them to a barbie, then they were cut from the list. Quality over quantity.
Bavington certainly fits Hickey’s universe well. His canvases are lavish and unapoletically beautiful, and like many of Hickey’s darlings, the decadent overpainting belies a shrewd intelligence underneath. Starting with measures of musical notation, Bavington’s paintings hover between intuitive abstraction, easy going west-coast conceptualism, and op while at the same time giving a firm nod to popular culture -- specifically a sort of tacky urban energy that we often discover, once we let our guard down, is quite aesthetically pleasing. If you wonder how Hickey's taste operates, with an eye that focuses as cleanly and alertly on Gajin Fujita as it does on Ellsworth Kelly or John Baldessari, Bavington might be a partial but incomplete answer.
The Neue Liebeslieder are of course for piano duet; the new piano texture was both welcome in itself and well navigated by the pianists, richer without ever becoming occluded. As for the vocal performances, much the same could be said as for the Zigeunerlieder. Christophers needed to calm down, and really had no business in part-conducting a piece such as ‘An jeder Hand die Finger’, for soprano solo (rather good, if somewhat bright in tone for Brahms). At least he desisted for most of the other solo songs. Even, though, where a piece went less hell for leather, for instance in ‘Finstere Schatten der Nacht’, it tended to emerge too moulded, audibly as well as visually. ‘Weiche Gräser im Revier’ was marred by Tenor II, ‘Ich kose süß mit der und der’ by Tenor I, who offered charmless, often out-of-tune, bellowing. A pity, given the quality of much of the rest of the singing. ‘Am Donaustrande, da steht ein Haus,’ from the op.52 Liebeslieder-Walzer, was a winning encore, more gemütlich than pretty much anything that had gone before. On the whole, however, the evening lacked Viennese charm and idiom; instead, we were left with an impression that Evensong had preceded the performances. To have had the singers stand around the piano, without conductor, might well have offered a better starting-point.
The second date was a lunch, followed by an afternoon walk. When we got back to my place, he asked to see my apartment and we ended up making out on the couch, which was fine…
* In April, the ANC Youth League's national conference turned into a mini battlefield. Rival factions threw water bottles at each other, exchanged blows, and sang derogatory songs about each other.
I tried to get photos of Luke but he did not want his photo taken. So of course we got more photos of AnnaMae.
“He’s new, and nervous. I think he’s a virgin too.” She said, edgy.
I may have hinted at this before, but I am a huge crybaby. Last night at work we watched Toy Story 3 and during the finally scene when Andy reluctantly passes on his favorite childhood toys, I could feel my chest tightening. As this is happening, my coworker comes up to me and tells me how she went and saw this with her kids and also brought along her cousin. She then went on to say how stupid her cousin was because she began weeping during this scene. Now normally I would own up to my sentimental ways, but seeing as my coworker was new, I got all embarrassed and pretended to laugh at her cousin while secretly wiping my eyes.
To Useful Present!
www.treesatlanta.org
The recipe called for 1/2 cup chopped walnuts but mom used 1/2 cup of chocolate chips instead.
His name was Martin Rinkart and he was a provincial clergyman in Ellenburg, Saxony, during the thirty years war. In addition to the calamities associated with any conflict, in 1637 the plague hit his village and in that one year 8,000 people died, including Rinkart's wife. He alone conducted more than 4,000 funerals for the people of that area, in one year. Then the plague was followed by famine, followed by foreign troops demanding 'tribute.' The list or troubles never seems to end.
Releasing their debut back in 2008, Blood Red Shoes’ first two albums refined fast, angry punk rock to its snarling apotheosis. Their third album ‘In Time To Voices’ was released earlier this year sees them “throw out their songwriting rulebook, entirely.” In coming weeks they’ll be touring it non-stop, but I managed to catch up with drummer Steven Ansell just before they played a show in Paris.
“On the part of Iraq, its exports in electrical materials, oil and gas and other industrial goods are of great economic value,’’ Al-Mery said.
And lest we forget, many of today's Arab presidential regimes were originally the product of revolts against hereditary heads-of-state seen as foreign-imposed (Egypt, Tunisia, Libya, Iraq, Yemen). But surely it's the West's fault these governments have stayed in place so long? A guarantee of pesky Islamists kept on a leash + access to black gold? Perhaps. The West was happy to deal with these secular strongmen, no doubt, but how to explain the authoritarianism in Arab countries with regimes long hostile to the West (Syria, Iraq pre-2003, Libya pre-2004) ?
when you reach your hand out?
Hearing this, Junsu put on gloomy face.
The exciting/unbelievable part of this past raid week was more Laz’s luck in gear than anything – taking him from the iLevel 383 equipped he was at pre-UR raiding to iLevel 393 equipped for the start of this coming raid week.
You and I don’t control monetary policy, the Federal Reserve Bank does.
~ Ayn Rand, The Fountainhead
On to beer...
Vanessa has been an inspiration to me. I admire people who follow their dreams as much as she does in order to make dreams become reality. She is such an amazing designer, so please check out her store here!!
I am living right outside of London (technically I am in London). I live on a busy road (I can hear the cars driving by as I type) and can get anywhere I need to via bus. If you walk down the hill about 2 minutes trees abound, there is a golf course, and further down is a farm. (Try to imagine this).
1-800-CDC-INFO
Lentils have been eaten by humans since Neolithic times and were one of the first domesticated crops. In the Middle East, lentil seeds have been found dating back more than 8000 years.
Wendy L
Common problems to avoid:
My biggest peeve reading it was Siddhartha’s whole “I’m better than all of you,” sort of attitude. Which, come on, if you’re seeking enlightenment, you can’t hold yourself on a different level than the people around you. Or rather, you can’t be completely at peace without actually taking in where you are and who (whom?) you’re surrounded by (by whom you’re surrounded. Grammar is difficult). Which was sort of the point at the end (I think?). When he kept calling the people around him that, well, went about their days making money, buying things, making trades, or in other words, surviving, the “child people” (something something they didn’t try to find the great beyond, they only wanted the satisfaction of the current, the present, not looking for anything greater and how could they not possibly see the greater world around them?! when of course, he was born and raised in a high caste and had lots of opportunities afforded him and the best education and “learned to think,” if you will, at a young age because of the teachers he eventually condemned…so if you turn it around – which is something I did reading – how could he possibly begin to understand what it meant to live a life outside of what you already know and are led to believe is the only way when all you’re trying to do is survive? Just because he was able to see that there was more to the world at a young age, doesn’t mean that other people were able to… or rather… that they had the opportunity to do so…) I got a bit annoyed. And by a bit I mean it got to the point that I wanted to put the book down and not finish. Which rarely happens.
1928 – 1996
If thou art true
As much as I love JYJ, ten times much more I hate Sm&Avex. How many times I wish those dirty companies bankrupted or go to hell..
Willie Dennis: Trombone
- I’m on my way to obtaining a mullet. My ears tickle when my hair brushes into them; how do girls not get bothered by this? Also, I wonder if my parents would recognize me if I came home without having gotten a haircut since December? Hmmm. Challenge accepted?
I look only to you for guidance, day after day.
Peace to them all
Enteroviruses commonly infect the gastrointestinal tract, and replication of enteroviruses has been well documented in the Peyer patches of the small bowel.
When planning a beach vacation to the Outer Banks & Southern Coast of North Carolina, be sure to compare Vacation Rentals By Owner (VRBO) & local real estate/management companies at:
Seems I shall have it up on a rack for inspection before I consider a purchase. Looks never reveal the evil hidden within...
When I speak at writing conferences, I'm inundated with requests about grants. I prefer to talk about funding streams - how to incorporate contests, publishing, freelance markets, jobs AND grants into a successful career that turns a real dollar. But the word "grant" stirs excitement in a room, in some cases making people tune out all else. Like winning the lottery, who doesn't crave free money?
6) I am frightened by flushing a toilet in the middle of the night
The high sugar priming rate probably helped keep the yeast alive during the voyage and resulted in a very bitter, alcoholic, and sparkling pale ale that could withstand the rigors of travel while having a reasonable shelf life in India.
in this bargain bin of a winter, she’s scared of pigeons.
What’s your favorite healthy food? JUICE! I love to juice! My sister gave me a juicer about 3 years ago and I just love making healthy yummy juices! My favorite is a green juice: Lettuce, Lemon, Green Apples and Parsley. It is a fabulous way to start your day!
I realize just how unusual my situation is...my day job, IS my passion! Being with my family, teaching my children, growing and learning along side them in the knowledge and wisdom of the Lord. Getting to dry their tears, celebrate their accomplishments and witness their milestones! Watching as they discover new things at their own, individual levels of learning, witnessing their relationships growing and changing. I love the way my girls get along! We have very few arguments or squabbles at our house, and it truly is a miracle to me, as I had never seen anything like it before with siblings!
After I got that out of my system, I got to work on the video. It’s not the best, and looking at it again, I can already see things I would change, but it’s the first project I’ve ever been paid for (even though I received no money, 4 nights at a decent hotel is not a bad payment!), and it’s a good start!
At the top of the block I think I am going to turn right,
This morning, on the steps of Los Angeles’ City Hall, Mayor Villaraigosa, in partnership with LACBC, Midnight Ridazz, LADOT, and LAPD, announced the winner of the Bike Awareness and Safety slogan contest by unveiling the “Give Me 3″ bus shelter posters, designed by graphic artist and LA cyclist Geoff McFetridge. The winning slogan was submitted by Danny Gamboa from Long Beach and will be visible in 150-200 bus shelters and Public Amenity Kiosks (PAKs) throughout the City. The remaining 800-850 ads will be installed between now and December on PAKs and bus shelters as space becomes available.
We review the just concluded ‘Arise Magazine Fashion Week’, which had 77 designers (from six continents) participating; there is a brilliant essay by tourism expert Godwin Goyang on how Nigeria can milk the limitless values of homegrown fabrics; the focus concludes with a piece on Legendary Gold’s Lexy Mojo-Eyes, the man who first made the runway business hip many years ago.
So Ive got 3 weeks worth of “DO” Life Lesson ideas but I need probably 20 + more week ideas. Any thoughts?
Listen to an excerpt from Zak’s Intermezzo in A Major as recorded on the ASQ’s new release With Strings Attached:
Cons: The White Waffle Weave Shower Curtain was the most expensive item to purchase, outside of the new re-tile job. The shower curtain was around $20 at Wal-Mart. Our son did a lot of the tile work, and his buddy from work did the rest, so we still got that job done for half what anyone else would have charged us.
A text
5. I'm allergic to Betadine.
Now, Misha is attempting to once again tap his social networking prowess (and large fanbase) to raise funds for a new charity, Random Acts. Not awesome. (Sadface.)
We will be re-scheduling the Art Stroll though so I will let you know as soon as I have details!
‘Yeah I bit into my burger and I suddenly had a very strong memory of being stood up for a date when I was sixteen by a girl who ended up with my best friend and broke my heart. I would have come and complained sooner but I’ve only just stopped crying.’
And I do! Happily, articles like this...help.
The next time you are washing your hands and complain that the water is not as warm as you are used to, think about how it was years ago.
Violetta Lipstick (MAC)
1 1/2 cups miniature marshmallows
So, as you may have noticed I have been a tad bit lazy posting my thoughts....well, you would notice if you were anxiously awaiting for me to tell you what I think about stuff - which, OF COURSE YOU ARE -- I mean, why on earth wouldn't you be doing that?? DOOY! ANYWAY, I have (yet another) excuse: We moved into the new Embassy.
The recent proclamation that “XMRV is not the cause of CFS,” came from an individual who did laboratory experiments to show how PCR experiments can become contaminated.
I hung my mother's coat back on its wooden hanger, which I hooked over the wooden pole, and then I closed the door to King Tut's Tomb.
I like seeing the different outfits Jessica puts together at What I Wore; Betty is amazing at Le Blog De Betty; Rockstar Diaries for clothes and lifestyle; Style Me Pretty (even though it's wedding-centric, the ideas are transferable to other events-so pretty and creative); and of course the vintage finds at Brileeo are inspiring!
I am nowhere special. Just at a coffee shop during the lunch rush on any old Monday. So few people are alone. A Mom and son sit across from me, heads nodded together in complicity. A newish couple behind me flirting: "You're hi-lar-ious" he just punches out into the sky, drawing out the syllables until she smiles unwillingly. Just beyond two co-workers, one shy enough that she laughs into her palm with a "Woowoowoo" like a cartoon ghost, her companion reacts with a hair shake and a whinny.
What a nice dilemma, having too much too good to make a decision. Planning to give both a spin, and of course share the results here.
Bernard Curtis Brown, 11, Washington, D.C.
The drive to build for a general strike must be pursued in conjunction with the democratization of the unions and/or the formation of new workers' organizations. As the current leaders continue to mislead the masses, workers' frustration will rise, and the opportunity to form class struggle rank-and-file caucuses that can challenge for power will grow. To win, these caucuses must advance strategy, tactics, and demands that unite the entire working class, and forge independence, and must prepare for and take united strike actions.
Brazen smatterings of post-hardcore and hard rock are the name of Caracal's game, something they do exceptionally well. There are shades of Underoath, Fugazi and mewithoutYou all over their straight-shooting, swashbuckler of an album, Bear. Shark. Wolf. Even if the music's genre isn't your cup of tea, one thing you can never fault this young band on is how proudly they wear their hearts on the sleeves, beating loudly for all the world to sit up and take notice.
45 minutes – GOALS! Vincent Kompany smacks in the ball with his enormous head. By the look on his face, that goal was better than sex. I’ll have to take his cum-face for it, since I’ve forgotten how that feels due to my non-existent sham of a sex life. A man has needs! (Sex needs)
Today I am writing about about our future, and reveal a big step I made recently . . . expect me to be writing more about this, ok? And expect support letters soon (J/K. Or . . . maybe not?). Of course, I somehow managed to sneak in a little such-and-such about Oprah. Just like I do.
A clever homage set in Northern England with Albert Finney forced to solve a family imbroglio and affecting a Bogart drawl and dress sense to try to make sense of it all. Unexpected and delightful, wonderfully acted.
Don't you just love "Fanny Bunny" - my retired Playboy Bunny???? I just couldn't resist having some fun with this birthday theme challenge - what a perfect card for a man!! You can find this great image along with all the other great "male" themed images at Dude Time Doodles!
HAPPY BIRTHDAY GRANNY, We love you!
I'm thinking maybe the name of this blog should be 'another day, another dress.' I do wear separates, too, I promise, but it's pretty much been some variation of jeans and a tee lately. Nothing that inspires me to whip out the camera. Perhaps that will be my goal for next week, to come up with interesting ensembles involving separates.
Watch this short clip from the BBC documentary entitled, “The Power of Nightmares: The Rise of the Politics of Fear”. It encapsulates what I said and believe above to be true much more eloquently:
for a man who presides over me
ZP: Yeah, yeah. In terms of how the band operates, the only major difference is how the live band is going to work. That’s always changed pretty dramatically in short bursts of time. We’ve had a pretty heavy turnover so we’re pretty use to people coming and going.
I can’t believe I’ve been so stupid for so long. Literally.
There are a few other to be eligible wants but in addition obtaining payday advances lending products.
One of the most archaic practices in the publishing industry is the returns policy that allows booksellers to purchase inventory that can be returned for full purchase price within, well, just about any timeframe. While originally a good idea to boost a flagging industry for the short term, keeping it instilled for the long term, especially when current technology bases forecasting and inventory management more on science than hope, is just perplexing at best and ludicrous at worst.
Seeking for a Friend for the End of the World stars comic genius Steve Carell, Keira Knightley, Adam Brody and others in what’s been described as “a humorous, moving and intimate journey against an epic backdrop of Earth’s final days.” The film is written and directed by screenwriter Lorene Scafaria, making her directorial debut.
Step 4 – Building the dough with the addition of fats, proteins and flavourings
I haven't done a medical update in quite a while, so it is past time. Currently I am in the hospital at Vanderbilt. It has been two years and two days since my bone marrow transplant and I was not really planning on being back in the hospital now.
Abbie, the daughter of the sunflowers, and the baby of the family shared a passage that touched me when I read it years ago…and it still touches me. I have walked in her shoes although I was closer to “back home” and had the ability to get “back home” in 8 hours driving and two hours flying. Clementine did not.
I adapted the recipe straight from the Cuisinart instruction booklet! They had a plain lemon sorbet, but I love anything ginger so I infused some ginger into the simple syrup mixture. Next time, I would infuse more ginger for a longer period of time to give it more ginger flavor (I love love ginger)
Let’s read it together:
A flash fire at printing company Delta Display Ltd resulted in two employees suffering burns. It seems that the incorrect cleaning solvent was used, creating flammable vapours. An HSE investigation found that the company had ignored guidance given by the press manufacturers that there was a danger of fire and explosion if any cleaning agent with a flash point below 55 degrees centigrade was used. The printing firm pleaded guilty to a breach of the Dangerous Substances and Explosive Atmospheres Regulations 2002 and was fined £12,000 with £5,250 costs.
Rebecca is the April author in the Spotlight here on Booksnob. She agreed to answer some questions about her book and her busy life. Let me tell you what I like about Rebecca, she is kind and open-hearted and a teacher, like me! If you like to get out into nature and ride your bike, you will enjoy this fast paced mystery of a novel. Please read this great interview that provides great insight into her young adult book, Chasing Alliecat.
I was going to make an old favorite, but I couldn't help doing a quick search for recipe ideas to see what else was out there. That search quickly ended when I found these cheesy meatloaf minis. I'm a sucker for minis (though usually it's baked goods) and these sounded so good. They incorporate a lot of the standard meatloaf mix-ins (onion, garlic, ketchup, breadcrumbs, egg, etc) but there were a few unique things that caught my eye. The breadcrumbs are toasted - it's an extra step that only takes about 3 minutes, but it added great flavor. Instead of adding raw onion, it's softened quickly on the stove top first, which I hoped would make it less noticeable to Shane in the end (not so much as it turned out, but I loved the addition). Best of all, though, little cubes of cheese are incorporated in the mini loaves, and as they bake, it gets all gooey and melty. I'm not sure I'll ever be able to make meatloaf without cheese going forward :) Because of their size, these minis cook more quickly than most meatloaf recipes I've made, which was also a nice added bonus! They were just the kind of comfort food I was seeking, and bound to be a repeat here next winter.
Accessoires: seam binding Daffodil delight ribbon
Who chooses when to fall for affection
The philosophy behind Chinese medicine is a melding of tenets from Buddhism, Confucianism, and the combined religious and philosophical ideas of Taoism. Although there are various schools of thought among practitioners of traditional Chinese medicine, five Taoist axioms form its basis:
The premise of the book is that there is going to be a future — a future that will be happening soon.
Then there is Milagro. She seems to have pretty strong attachments to all the important people in her life but sometimes I wonder about her being too attachment. Not to us but to things. She has a box full of "special rock-ies" and "Y" sticks. Heaven forbid we break or misplace one. On our evening walks she must greet several special rocks and plants around the neighborhood. Sometimes she talks to them. Currently she is "saving" the eyes, teeth and bow tie from her chocolate Easter bunny so she can "remember" it. And then there is the almost empty potato chip bag on her desk with a lone potato chip in it: "Chip-y."
For my card I cut circles out of shades of blue cardstock and stamped the images in Jenni Bowlin Spice Tin ink. I arranged them and adhered them down with varying heights of adhesive. I finished the card off with a curved sentiment & rounded corner.
Labor Day we are expecting temps in the low 30's, so more color to follow!
I bought some really nice things during the last months, like those two pairs of shoes. The brown ones were bought for 17€ at some cheapass clothing store in Wiesbaden yesterday after my last written exams, the other ones I ordered from here: Mel
